I kicked my parents out for laughing at my daughter last weekend. I had my parents over for dinner everything was fine until my 10-year-old daughter asked if she could play a song she'd been practicing on her keyboard she was excited and proud to share her progress with us it wasn't perfect she missed a few notes but she was giving it her all and. I was proud of her as soon as she finished. I clapped but to my shock my parents started laughing not a little chuckle fullon loud belly laughs my mom asked if it was her first time playing and my dad joked that even a dog could have played it better. I saw my daughter's face drop her smile fade as she explained. I've only had two lessons but they just laughed harder. I couldn't. P back. I stood up took their cups and said leave now my mom tried to brush it off saying they were just preparing her for the real world but. I was done. I told them you were bullies when. I was a kid and you're still bullies now get out after they left. I sat with my daughter told her how proud. I was and reassured her that their cruelty had nothing to do with her. I asked her to play the song again and this time she did with more confidence later. I texted my parents saying we needed a break until they learned how to behave my dad called me precious for standing up for her and my sister called to lecture me about being overprotective. I told her to stay out of it. I'll always stand up for my daughter but should. I have handled it differently.

What's the fastest you've wiped a smirk off of someone's face my stepfather used to love to make my life miserable one of the ways he did this was to walk through the kitchen while. I was washing dishes plunge his hand into the dishwater and yell this dishwater is ice cold you can't get dishes clean in cold water now empty that out make some hot dishwater and wash all these over again since. I detested washing dishes this would always make me cry or feel defeated then he would smirk and walk out of the kitchen feeling very proud of himself it didn't matter how hot the dishwater was it was always the same sometimes he'd wait until. I was almost done when the dishwater was sure to be barely warm so one night. I had had enough. I put a stockpot on the stove to boil then poured the boiling water in the sink with some dish soap. I loaded the sink with dishes and then stirred them around a bit with a wooden spoon to make it sound like. I was doing dishes sure enough. I soon heard him coming my way as he walked into the kitchen. I took a step back so he could easily reach the sink he plunged his hand into the boiling hot dishwater his hand came out of that sink so fast it was a blur he said nothing and gave no indication that he had just stuck his hand in boiling water he just looked at me with mingled hatred and respect and walked out of the kitchen without a word that was the last time he ever tested my dishwater.

What's the best case of. Instant. Karma that you've ever seen while working for the fire department on a call for a multi-vehicle rollover accident on the interstate we got on the interstate one exit away running into traffic so we moved over to the emergency. Lane with lights and siren we were about halfway there and a. BMW pulls in front of us trying to cut through the traffic he didn't even look. I laid into the air horn and he came to a complete stop with his middle finger out the window. I'd had a lot of people do stupid things when seeing lights coming at them but this guy was being an ass for the sake of being an ass he got out of his car and started screaming at us meanwhile he was blocking the only fire engine and two ambulances available people were really hurt half a mile away and he was making a stand because we honked our air horn at him for blocking us. I looked out at my mirror to see a highway patrolman running between lanes towards us he was pissed. BMW boy was immediately arrested his pretty car got pushed out of the way into a ditch and he went to jail the people in the accident were hurt bad and two cars had to be cut open to get people extricated from bent metal it was frustrating.

Students what was the most pissed off you've seen a teacher get at another student my. US history teacher was a. Vietnam vet and suffered from. PTSD he was also one of the sweetest easygoing and understanding teachers. I'd ever had he was very upfront about his. PTSD to prevent mishaps in the classroom that might trigger it during a class about the. Vietnam. War one of the school jocks had loud explosions gunfire and what have you on a. Walkman yeah this was a while ago and during a story my teacher had about his time in the. Marines as one of the men who went into the. Viet. Kong tunnels the kid began to play. The. Sounds causing my teacher to dive under his and begin screaming orders much to the. Jock's amusement and everyone else's disgust when the teacher's aid managed to calm the teacher down enough to get him coherent he marched over to the kid who began to play the tape again and my teacher just did a straight punch right to his face without a warning breaking his nose and grabbed the. Walkman and destroyed it by slamming it into the floor and then went right back to teaching the class as if nothing happened student tried to get the teacher fired after this incident but it turns out triggering a well-loved teacher's. PTSD doesn't get you much sympathy do you think the veteran teacher did the right thing.

Teachers how easy is it for you to tell who has a crush on who in elementary school. I got randomly paired up with a new girl on one of the first days of school she was absolutely stunning in my 11-year-old eyes we actually got along super well she was really easy to make laugh and. I was a bit of a goofball while the other boys my age were trying to act tough so it was a good. Dynamic. I guess the teacher took notice because even though. I had my established friends that. I usually worked with and she found her friends that she hung out with every student also noticed this and liked the fact if me and her were to date we were always seated together and randomly paired although. I ended up dating someone towards the end of the year so that got a bit awkward at times but then. High. School happened. I had left the district for a few years but moved back so. I had to restart a bit people still knew me but had changed so much that it was hard to jump right back in. I ended up meeting a girl during summer drumcore. I was good friends with her boyfriend so we became friends by proxy and by friends. I mean absolutely. Inseparable so much so that after her boyfriend graduated and inevitably broke up with her everyone at our school thought we were dating every student teacher faculty. Administration either were convinced we were together or openly shipped us we finally got together at the very end of my year 12 and our course instructor looked at us and dead pan said took you to long enough.

What was the best revenge you've ever gotten my friend. Mike had a serious crush on a beautiful popular girl who always claimed to be busy whenever he asked her out but she never told him no. I think she liked the attention one day. Mike got two tickets to a soldout. YouTu concert and quickly invited his dream girl she eagerly accepted and he was thrilled on the night of the concert they were at the arena waiting for the show to start when she suddenly said oh. I see my friend. I'll be right back she never came back. Mike waited at their seats and even after the show hoping to drive her home but she disappeared without answering his calls or texts he left feeling deeply hurt by the next morning he was understandably pissed she called him around noon apologizing and saying she ran into her ex they had a long talk worked out a lot of stuff and lost track of time she had actually missed the concert and blah blah blah he accepted her apology and asked if they could try again she accepted and told him how nice and forgiving he was she had underestimated him so the next. Saturday evening he took her to a very expensive seafood restaurant about an hour up the coast he was polite and chatty the whole way there he made the reservation in her name they were seated ordered a nice bottle of wine some expensive appetizers and an entree then. Mike excused himself to go to the men's room he very deliberately said. I'll be right back he walked out to the parking lot and drove away.

What's your biggest regret. I beat up an autistic kid who wouldn't stop touching me recently. I turned 15 and. I'm struggling with severe anger management issues so. I usually try to keep to myself but there's this autistic student. Jimmy who rides my school bus initially. Jimmy said nice things like you're attractive or we should go out. I thought he was being bullied so. I just ignored them this worked for a while but it kept got worse over time. Jimmy started touching me. I gently pushed him away and asked him to stop but he kept doing it he'd stroke my arm and face saying things such as come on. Hannah. I know you're interested everyone on my bus would laugh at me. I couldn't do anything because he's autistic but. I couldn't allow it to continue so one day after failing my midterms. I was pissed and the second. I went on the bus. Jimmy started teasing what's wrong. Hannah rough day sweetie everyone was laughing at me. Jimmy sat beside me and touched my thigh saying. I'll cheer you up. Hannah everyone started recording and. I warned him to back off but he didn't. Jimmy leaned in close and whispered relax. Hannah. I'm here for you that was the breaking point. I stood up and slapped the brains off him. Jimmy ended up in tears with a bloody nose. I received a 2E suspension from school and was banned from the bus my parents were really mad at me and grounded me for 2 months without my phone. I still wish. I never did it was. I in the wrong.

My brother-in-law gave my disabled little sister a brutal reality check which caused her to have a breakdown my parents have three kids. Maya me and. Sally the issue has always been. Sally she was born with a severe medical condition and doctors didn't expect her to survive but my parents never gave up they spent everything they had on her treatment and miraculously she survived but only with brain deformities which made her unable to socialize or be fully aware since then my parents have coddled her endlessly. Sally always got the best of everything while. I got the hand me downs it didn't bother me too much but it was clear. I was the neglected middle child. Maya the oldest took the brunt of it. Sally and mayia always tried to one up each other and our parents did nothing but put gas on the fire. Maya was expected to be perfect while. Sally got away with everything she bullied me stole my thing when. Maya had a. R Sally made out with him just to hurtt her our parents didn't save for college but. Maya earned a scholarship while. I had to take out loans the final straw was when mayia brought her. College boyfriend home only to catch him and. Sally together despite initial scolding our parents quickly downplayed it even suggesting that. Sally and the guy should be together mayia had enough cut contact and moved on she met a great guy called. Adam and they got married and is now pregnant at a family dinner. Sally is married to. May's ex and said that mayia must find it hard to be there and made fun of how her ex was with the upgraded model. Maya's husband. Adam snapped he brutally called out. Sally for constantly trying to overshadow. Maya and even trying to flirt with him pointing out her lack of achievements and jealousy he told her that her condition doesn't excuse her for anything she did and that she was just a spoiled little kid. Sally ended up in tears and ran out the party.

What's the most unethical parenting hack you know. I told our daughter that the kids ears turn red when they lie but only parents can see it she would enter rooms with her hands covering her ears and we knew we were in for a lie two to ensure your kids won't bother you tell them to wake you up in an hour so we can start cleaning the house they will do anything to avoid waking you three my nephew refused to vacuum so. I told him the thing about the vacuum sucking up ghosts. I said that vacuuming kept houses from getting haunted that's why haunted houses are so dusty 10 years later he is still a neat freak and. I feel responsible four if your toddler accidentally touches something hot you have to opportunity to tell him many things in the house are also hot and should be avoided five when it's past their bedtime their dad changes the language on the. TV to. Spanish when the kids act confused he says it must be because you're tired six tell your that they snore in their sleep really often that way you'll know if they're pretending to sleep because they'll fake snore seven this may have worked better for me since one of the kids parents has hearing loss but. I told my four at the time nephew that. I couldn't hear whining and if he would like to try again in a different tone of voice. I could understand him better. I told him right now. I could see his lips move but that was all he did an admirable job with modulation after that and. I got him what he'd asked for eight eight. I don't know if it's truly unethical but don't react when your kid falls over the first thing your kid will do once they have fallen is look to you and if you panic they'll panic and start crying nine friend at school's parents told him he was allergic to alcohol which they said they found out when he accidentally drank some as a toddler they told him he was in intensive care and nearly died on his 18th birthday they told him they made it up so he didn't drink when underage.

My parents make me take a blood bath once a year. I found out why once a year my parents had me take a blood bath it was always on the day before my birthday a tradition. I didn't enjoy but never questioned my mother would lead me to the tub my father sitting on the edge dipping his fingers in to check the temperature for me. I would sit while they washed it into my skin and hair making sure that. I was completely covered before letting me get out then. I would have to wait as it dried making my skin feel tight and sticky. I was then sent off to bed with a hug and kiss on my birthday the first thing. I did was shower off watching the red. Retreat down the drain then it was like any other birthday singing presents and. Cake it never crossed my mind that our tradition was abnormal. I was excited for my 10th birthday the prospect of having two digits to my age was exhilarating to me. I'd been homeschooled my whole life and but had plenty of friends in my neighborhood to invite to my party. I was asking my friend. Jimmy if he was going to be able to come when. I caught a glimpse behind the veil man. I have to go visit my cousins on. Saturday but maybe. I can play with you the day before he had asked. I thought about it but knew that my annual bath was due that day disappointed. I explained to him why that wouldn't work. Shucks that's the day. I have to take my bath. I told him okay well maybe after that no. I'll be all sticky plus all the blood gets on everything. I could tell by his expression that. I had said something wrong he went running his mouth to everyone calling me a vampire and upsetting both of our parents albeit for different reasons that night. I.

Nerds have you ever felt bad for your bully in nth grade. I signed up to be a tutor for one of the worst bullies in school. Jared he only knew the alphabet and could spell his name he also got held back for 2 years because he couldn't read so. I told him he was probably right but we took the same bus home and. I asked if he wanted to study at his house but he said no after. I reminded him that he needed to pass he agreed my house was always kind of noisy kind of cluttered it didn't bother me to see. D old dishes or a messy room but this kid's house had open beer cans rotting food cigarette butts and used diapers everywhere the little kid looked like he was six but was still wearing diapers his dad didn't know. I was coming over and started yelling but. Jared yelled back about how he had a group assignment and we had to work on it together and then he just left then we finally went into the bedroom and studied. I told my parents what the house was like and they told. CPS multiple times but they never got involved the next day. Jared tells me that. I can't come over anymore so. I tell him we can always go to my house to study instead he says agrees. Jared and. I do the tutoring thing until dinner time and. Mom asks him if he wants to stay he says no that night but the next night he says yes and that turns into a daily thing he stays well after dark every day he only lets my dad drive him if it was snowing or raining he still got in fights and bullied other kids at school but at my house he was always quiet and respectful it was like he was two completely different people and every time. I looked at other bullies. I stopped thinking that he's just a jerk and started wondering why instead.

I found my wife's photo album and now. I'm tempted to cheat on her my wife. Isabelle and. I met because of a murder in our freshman year at. College her dorm had been blocked by the cops because a girl we both knew had been found stabbed 42 times in her bed the killer has taken her eyes mouth nose with him the strangest thing was that not one person in the crowded dorm heard her scream. I was there for her when the police announced they were trying to search for the killer but had no leads he struck again a few. Towns over exact same. Mo and then again a town over from there the. Press began to call him the college butcher. Isabelle spent more time at my room after that it was perfect. Too. Perfect and. I should have been smarter wiser but. I was young stupid and deeply in love we got married a few years after college after. I had got a job as a software developer and she had got a job working as a teacher at the local high school we bought a house in a quiet safe neighborhood in a quiet safe town and for a while everything seemed so good for 10 whole years everything has been good until 3 weeks ago when. I decided to clear out the attic because. I could swear. I heard something skittering up there.

What my girlfriend did yesterday makes me want to marry her instantly yesterday when. I came home from work. I was extremely exhausted however. I wanted to record a video for my. YouTube channel so when. I got on my. PC. I started recording with. FaceCam before. I knew it. I fell asleep during the recording when. I woke up the next morning in my bed. I realized. I hadn't plugged in my phone to charge so. I decided to take my girlfriend's phone to call my boss but when. I unlocked her phone. I saw that. Google was open and. I saw what she had recently searched for she wanted to know how to save the game. I was playing. I was confused at first but then. I went to my. PC and turned it on. I was looking for the recording last night and then. I started watching it a few minutes after. I slept and my girlfriend came in to look for me and when she saw me sleeping in my chair she giggled a bit and then she helped me out of my chair while. I was still half asleep. I'm like twice her size but somehow she managed to get me out of my chair and she laid me into the bed where she tucked me in and gave me a kiss on the forehead after that she returned to the. PC and tried to save my game properly.

What is your family's most devious secret when. I was seven my dad cheated on my mother with my stepmom. Karen after her divorce my mom moved away and got married again. I was always under the impression that my mother abandoned me and that's what my dad told me too. Karen had a daughter at that time who was five. Mia her and. I were kind of close growing up but when we both hit puberty our personality started to be different. Mia was the typical girly girl she developed beautifully she would get all the attention. I was basically a nerd. I was overshadowed by. Mia my dad was someone who was an opportunist whenever he would see an opportunity for him to shine he would take it even if it meant sidelining his own daughter. I was kind of jealous but. I believed if. I did something good. I would be appreciated so. I studied hard and got into a prestigious. University that was the only time my father threw a party for me because. I was the first in the family to do it but. Mia was jealous of it so anyways during my last year of high school. I started dating. Tim he proposed to me when we were sophomores in college but we decided to wait till our graduation so one day during our semester break. I went to his home and. I saw the inconceivable he was banging m.

What did your girlfriend do after she saw that your banana was less than 3 in. I'm with my girl and we're about to take things to the next level when she reaches down and grabs my banana but then she looks up at me disappointment written all over her face is that it she says pointing at my manhood. I'll admit. I was embarrassed but. I tried to play it cool and said hey it's not the size that matters it's how you use it but she wasn't having it she stood up grabbed her stuff and stormed out of my room. I was devastated. I thought she was different but. I guess she was just like all the other girls only interested in guys with big bananas but then something amazing happened. I got a call from my girlfriend and she sounded really upset she said she'd been thinking about what happened between us and she realized that she was being shallow and unfair she said she didn't care about the size of my banana she cared about me. I couldn't believe it. I was so happy. I started crying we got back together and things have been great ever since.

My husband slapped my best friend for staring at my. Honkers my husband and. I had a baby several months ago and. I'm breastfeeding her after having a baby my. Honkers have increased my husband loves the increase and has lately been expressing jealousy if anyone showed attention to me both of our families and friends gathered together for a family celebration halfway through dinner my best friend. Amy was staring at my chest for a long time and. I jokingly said you look like you want a taste of my. Honkers and we both laughed without warning my husband slapped my best friend on the face and said her. Honkers are only for me to look at. Amy was stunned and left table while. I looked at my husband in shock he said sorry. I'm an alpha male we're a bit territorial now his parents saw everything and they said that he has every right to defend his territory. I went after. Amy who was crying and already had an angry red mark on the side of her face a few days passed and the red mark turned into a horrendous bruise. I cried this morning because. I can see that my best friend is in pain and she's still not going to press charges because. I'm her friend. I'm terrified at the thought of being a single mother and. I don't know if. I can handle motherhood on my own but. Amy said that she will support me.

My husband thinks. I'm ugly. I've never loved him more. I am an unattractive woman. I met my husband 4 years ago and he was the best thing that had ever happened to me he had always told me. I was beautiful and somehow sounded honest without sounding like my mother last night he had a group of friends over to our home. I was upstairs in the kitchen preparing snacks when. I was able to hear them in the basement. I realized they were talking about me they were teasing my husband about me specifically about my looks. I could tell it was supposed to be funny it was not there was a point where one of them referred to me as a troll and my husband blew up started shouting listen shut the f up. I know that she is ugly but shut up she makes me happy does your bimbo of the week do that. Jim. Dave how long has it been since we've hung out and you haven't complained about your wife he went on for a while defending me but all. I could hear was. I know she's ugly. I know she's ugly. I know she's ugly again and again in my head it just broke me. I didn't know why. I'd always known. I was unattractive but he wasn't supposed to he told me. I was beautiful so sincerely and consistently that. I started to actually believe he thought that.

What did your psycho. X do. I caught my girlfriend of 6 years cheating on me in the basement with a guy who looked no older than 16 when. I caught them. I told them to make themselves home have fun and went upstairs to do my daily things few minutes later. I heard them mumbling things to each other in the hallway and the guy left the house girlfriend hesitantly checked on me. I was cooking my meal and she started screaming shouting and accusing me of not loving her pleading with me to show some reaction she threw things at me shouted and cursed. I didn't budge a bit and completely ignored her after she consumed all of her rage she simply left the house now the thing is it's not like. I didn't love her. I firmly believe cheaters are losers the only reason they do things behind their partner's back is they are dependent on their partner that is why. I believe it's best to ignore them. I packed my important things and left the house the same night in the following year. I made sure to live my best life got a promotion a fat raise and hit it off with a girl. I met a few weeks after the incident all that time. I did not block her from any of my social media.

What thing are you still salty about my parents gifted my brother a guitar for. Christmas upon realizing the required effort for learning he quit and the guitar found its place in a corner of his room a few years later. I developed an interest in learning the guitar astonishingly my brother decided to give it another shot but he conveniently practiced only when. I intended to use the guitar one day having saved up money. I purchased a. Beatles song book excited. I brought it home and fetched the guitar but my brother suddenly craved its use. I protested to my parents but they sided with my brother stating that the guitar belonged to him reluctantly. I yielded the guitar to him and he then requested to borrow my new song book. I firmly refused which led him to complain to our parents they compelled me to lend it to him reasoning that the song book was of no use to me without a guitar what adds to my frustration. I had requested my own guitar for. Christmas only to be denied with the explanation that they had already spent a significant amount on my brother's guitar which he never learned to play their stance was we won't repeat that mistake again.

What's the fastest you've wiped a smirk off of someone's face my stepfather used to love to make my life miserable one of the ways he did this was to walk through the kitchen while. I was washing dishes plunge his hand into the dishw water and yell this dish water is ice cold you can't get dishes clean in cold water now empty that out make some hot dish water and wash all these over again since. I detested washing dishes this would always make me cry or feel defeated then he would smirk and walk out of the kitchen feeling very proud of himself it didn't matter how hot the dish water was it was always the same sometimes he'd wait until. I was almost done when theh water was sure to be barely warm so one night. I had had enough. I put a stock pot on the stove to boil then powered the boiling water in the sink with some dish soap. I loaded the sink with dishes and then. SED them around a bit with a wooden spoon to make it sound like. I was doing dishes sure enough. I soon heard him coming my way as he walked into the kitchen he plunged his hand into the boiling hot dish water his hand came out of that sink so fast it was a blur he looked at me with mingled hatred and respect and walked out of the kitchen that was the last time he ever tested my dishw water.

How did you lose your virginity. I was around 14 and was at a family reunion with a bunch of my relatives me and a few of my cousins are hanging out in the jacuzzi and my sister is there as well we just are talking about life when my dad says that the burgers are ready all my cousins and sisters get out for some food while. I just stay in the jacuzzi for a while one of my neighbors let his dog off the leash so it immediately came over to me and. I just tried to get it away from me and. I eventually had to go back inside to avoid it the adults of the family reunion said that they were going out to the club and hired some musical guests to entertain us one of the people they hired was smoking hot but she was 25 because. I looked at her. Wikipedia. I tell the others that. I'm going to sneak out and go to the pet suppli store to get some accessories while. I'm there. I see this huge peacock that has these bright feathers and. I'm so mesmerized that. I fall asleep when. I wake up. I'm getting head from a. Target employee.

Parents kicked me out at 16 to make room for my sister's new baby. I posted about their neglect online and. Dad begged when. Rich grandparents threatened his inheritance. I turned 16 just a week ago there was no party no celebration and my parents barely even wished me the reason behind that was my older sister. Amanda she's pretty much my parents favorite and has always been for some reason she's 7 months pregnant right now and since we have a house with four bedrooms my parents sat me down on the morning of my birthday to inform me that they now wanted me to move to my aunt's house so the new baby could have the room my parents have never really cared about me and have always done the bare minimum but this was shocking after they were done explaining to me we just sat there in silence for a while they told me that they would still take care of all my expenses until. I turned 18 and make sure. I was well fed and looked after but they just couldn't keep me with them in the same home anymore. I asked them why they couldn't just use the guest room for the nursery they told me that they'd use that for. Amanda's boyfriend to stay with them.

Employees look down at me not knowing my family owns the company. I just graduated from college my parents made it clear that. I was going to work for them my parents own a huge. Waste. Management. Service. Company everything went well the first few weeks until. I started getting treated like complete. I found myself doing most of the work. I did this throughout the months until my breaking point when we started wrapping up one of the senior workers. Ron threw his share of the remaining tasks at me he told me that. I should handle it because. I was new. I told him that. I wouldn't do it he smirked at me and told me that management is not going to like it. I told him to go to management because. I didn't care. Ron looked at me surprised and told me to come with him. I followed him where he led me to one of the higher ups that person was his close friend he began complaining to him about how. I don't want to work the higher up proceeded to ask me how. I got hired in which. I replied through a family member he asked me which family member hired me in which. I replied my father's name both of them looked surprised and. I cut them off and told them to keep up their energy once they both get fired.

I collected evidence of my wife's. Affair for months before filing for divorce it paid off massively with several break-ins throughout nearby neighborhoods. I thought it would be wise to get a security system. I went ahead and purchased a wireless one with the open and close doors sensors and set it up my wife went ballistic when. I told her about the system. I consulted a friend about the issue he was in the same boat as me it didn't make any logical sense to not have the door sensors but this is where the course of my life changed after some thoughtful silence my friend asked me have you ever thought there may be someone else coming and going while you're not there a week later. I had a business trip and when. I checked the alarm system in the evening it wasn't online. I checked it the next morning and it was back online. I swallowed this and didn't say anything to her but it repeated the next two evenings offline and then back online. I mentioned this to my friend and he said alarm systems aren't that flaky don't you think it's strange that it's offline when you are away but never has this issue when you're around so. I went to the store and got a camera to hook up to the system and set the camera facing the system itself so that. I could see if my wife was manually turning it off.

What was the incident at your high school a 14-year-old girl knocked on the door to interrupt a pregnant teacher in the middle of a lesson and proceeds to wail on her head with a hammer after a few hits one of my friends grabbed the. Girl by the back of the shirt and swung her full force into a cinder block wall and she just crumbled my friend got proclaimed a hero on the news and at. Upstate. College gave him a scholarship the teacher had a fractured skull with bone chips that had to be removed from her head her husband a teacher down the hall had to be restrained by colleagues to keep him from ending the 14-year-old the teacher fully recovered and gave birth to a healthy boy the motive for the attack was the teacher was calling the girl's parents for academic performance the parents said if she kept getting in trouble she wouldn't be able to go to the prom the teacher called and she got in trouble she came into school the next day with a hammer and sock full of. D batteries and told her friends she was going to end that teacher. I remember a year later a friend of the girl came up us with a petition to get her friend released from juvie.

My sister spent her college fund on parties and trips and now that her money is gone she demands that. I pay for her lifestyle my father always taught my sister and me techniques to save money. I always found these lessons boring but. I recognized their importance my sister on the other hand said she didn't care about saving when. I turned 18 my father gave me the money he had saved for my college but since. I had received an 80% scholarship. I managed to save bunch of it with which many years later. I opened a company after a few years my sister also turned 18 and received the college money she made it clear that she would spend it all on trips my father just said she could do whatever she wants but he won't help her financially again my sister used to call from time to time saying that. I was silly for working when. I could have enjoyed life this year my sister's money ran out all this time she thought our father was bluffing of course he wasn't. I let her stay at my house for a few weeks but that's until. I realized that some objects were disappearing. I asked her and she said it was her who was taking the objects and selling them to buy new makeup. I kicked her out of the house every single day she shows up at my door screaming saying. I'm unfair for doing this eventually. I called police on her which got her arrested.

Stepmother thinks she owns the house and removed all my family photos she doesn't know it's my inheritance my father and. I live in my mom's ancestral house that. I inherited when she died due to cancer my father got married to his high school sweetheart. Karen a few months ago they moved in a week after the small wedding that. I wasn't even invited to. Karen came with baggage. I mean twin stepsisters and their two. Chihuahua the first issue was. Karen wanted me move to a smaller room since my room has the biggest closest that she needed the second issue their dogs leaves poops around the house and the twins wouldn't even clean third. Karen removed all the family photos and replaced them with pictures of her and the twins. Karen and. I had a heated argument about it she said that they could do whatever they wanted as it's her husband's house and. I shouldn't speak since was not raised properly due to having a useless mother. I told her that she could pack her things along with her twins because. I was kicking her out she said that. I had no right to kick them out of her house. I told her lady you are living under my roof this is my house. I inherited it from my mother and right now you and your daughters are trespassing get out before. I call the cops she was floored and couldn't speak anymore.

I got revenge on my bully in school. I was relentlessly bullied two girls in particular had it out for me. I was shy loved to read didn't do the popular stuff so. I was the perfect. Vic they literally. Torture. Me by holding me down in the staircase when we were alone and sticking pinboard pins into my arms legs and feet well. I finally got my revenge. I went to try out a new ice cream shop and lo and behold one of the girls was serving the ice cream. I have them multiple allergies including milk and gluten of which the ice cream shop claimed to be cautious so. I ordered gluten and dairyfree ice cream and set my phone camera up to film the area where the ice cream was prepared because. I saw that the girl had recognized me and was certain she'd try something and she did. I caught her on camera putting a spoonful of milk in the bottom of the bowl and crumbling the gluten consisting. Wafers over everything then camouflaging it with the last scoop of ice cream she put it down in front of me and said. I hope you enjoy it. I sweetly smiled at her and asked if she could get the owner of the shop because. I wanted to thank her for being so welcoming to guests with allergies. I showed the owner the video and told her that. I'd like to press charges bully will never work anywhere where she'll come in contact with food again and she'll have this on her criminal record for years.

My religious sister told me that my child dying was. God's will so when her husband cheated. I told her the exact same thing. I am a lesbian and married to. Kelly both of us really wanted to have children so we decided to find a donor and. Kelly became pregnant the whole family was incredibly happy my older sister. Kim has always been my support but recently she started a relationship with a guy named. Simon he's an extremely. Conservative. Christian the two of them made uncomfortable jokes throughout the pregnancy they got engaged and got married in the meantime then a huge tragedy struck. Kelly had a car accident that resulted in the loss of the baby. Kelly then nearly took her life right after this event. Simon had the audacity to say that losing the baby was a blessing for the child because then she wouldn't be raised by a couple driven by lust instead of the true love. God had planned. Kim said it really was. God's will that the child wouldn't be born without a father a few days ago. I learned that. Kim had caught. Simon in bed with her best friend he admitted to the affair and fled to another city to live with his lover during this mess. Kim was pregnant but the stress led her to miscarry when she called me crying and shared the news. I coldly replied that it really was. God's will for the child not to be born without a father.

My sister keeps announcing bad news every year at every celebration of my life. I've had enough and walked out my whole life. I have been told that the day. I was born was the worst in our family because it was also the day my sister was diagnosed with cancer my family hated celebrating my birthday and they would often ignore my birthday when. I turned 16 my friends decided to throw me a party to celebrate my birthday my sister wasn't invited but decided to show up and started telling everyone she had another cancer scare which ruined the. Vibes when. I graduated high school my sister announced that her engagement had ended my family decided to cancel the graduation party because my sister needed. Comfort. I finally spoke to my parents and told them how awful it made me feel they apologized and told me they would throw me a graduation party to congratulate me on my achievements during the party my sister showed up and announced she'd had a miscarriage to everyone and the party died as the focus went to her her husband told me. I should make non family leave because my sister needed family so. I left it took them 2 hours to notice and when they did they were all asking what the hell. I thought. I was doing leaving like that and my sister cried down the phone to me saying that she felt. I would support her.

One day my younger sister. Angela noticed some of her underwear was missing she went looking for them and found the missing items in my brother's room however they were wet and slimy she immediately told our parents that day my 15-year-old brother. Trey was hanging out in the basement with his friends my parents decided to confront my brother in front of his friends this was the biggest mistake of their life our mom said. I knew you were weird but not this weird my dad added. I raised a predator hey. Tommy tre's friend did you know you were friends with a disgusting predator in the end my parents asked me to pick him up and let him stay with me when. I picked him up he didn't utter a word and sat in silence tra spent most of his time in the room he was staying in at my place he wasn't going to school when. I walked by his room. I could just hear him sobbing at the end of the week our parents wanted to talk to him when our parents arrived they apologized to him over the week they noticed more of my sister's clothing in his room until one day my dad caught our dog with her clothes but the damage had already been done his friends had gone around telling everyone about what a creep tray was and that girl should be careful around him in a small town once a rumor becomes prevalent enough it becomes fact and now. Trey's reputation is destroyed.

I had an old neighbor who was rumored to be dangerous growing up there were all sorts of stories about him circulating in the neighborhood people said he was crazy and that he had unived his family our parents used to warn us about him but one year my brothers and. I decided to knock on his door for trick-or-treating we were terrified but we knocked and to our surprise he opened the door with the biggest smile we peaked inside and saw that his house was well kept he greeted us warmly and said you guys made my day. I always buy chocolates every year but no kid ever comes by he filled our bags with tons of chocolates it honestly made me sad that he is just a simple harmless old man we didn't tell our parents but since then we would visit him to say hi he was always excited to see us he has been alone for 30 years after his wife passed away from giving birth we visited him regularly until we left for college when he passed away my brothers and. I went back home for his funeral to our surprise after the sale of his home the proceeds were given to us the lawyer handed us a letter from him which said your presence gave me hope and you are the first ones. I will tell my wife about.

My husband died and. I have to pretend that he was a great man who loved me my husband passed away 3 months ago and. I was relieved of that he abused me financially mentally and even physically when. I got pregnant he convinced me to quit my job saying that he would take care of me. I believed him but he never let me buy anything without asking his permission. I couldn't even buy my medicines without his permission and to get his permission he would force me to give him. BJs but. I stayed there because. I still loved him and. I didn't have a place to go when. I finally stopped loving him he started his first. Affair he made me believe that. I was to blame for the affair because. I was not able to sleep with him after giving birth. I was already planning my exit and saving money while. I was secretly working from home since he wouldn't let me step outside but my husband died in a way. I never would have expected he is now a martyr everyone around me talks about how beautiful our relationship was his family talks about what a great man he was and how always he focused on giving me everything the day he died. I cried a lot but not out of sadness. I cried with relief and felt free it would have taken me too many years to save money for lawyers but now. I have the house. I have the monthly money for being a widow and. I have my children with me.

My entitled mother demanded that. I give my daughter to my sister. I recently gave birth to twin girls. I had kept this a secret from my family to surprise them a month before. I gave birth my sister's child tragically passed away and my family mourned the loss of the baby when. I gave birth my whole family visited me except for my sister and her husband. I understood because they were still grieving news quickly spread that. I had given birth to twins my sister visited with her in-laws her mother-in-law immediately said that. God had sent another baby for my sister claiming one of my twins was a. Reincarnation of their. Lost. Child. I firmly told them that both babies were mine they held my twins and looked at each other convinced that one of them was indeed their lost baby my husband quickly took our babies and kicked them out later that day my mother visited and insisted. I should give one of my twins to my sister because she was in morning. I refused and told her they were mine the next morning we saw on our ring camera that her mother-in-law was standing in front of our door at 3:00 a.m. praying it sent chills down my spine. I threatened them to leave us alone every day for 1 week a dead bird that was gutted is on our porch and a red colored stain on the sides of our home.

My son keeps saying his teacher has a guat last week my 9-year-old son came home from school and. I asked him what he did he gave me the usual saying he went to class played with friends did some assignments whatever but this time he said something else that. I didn't expect he said that he saw the teacher's. Gat. I asked him what the word. Gat meant and he just said that. I was too old to understand so. I assumed this was some word the youngsters were using to sound cool and. I Shrugged it off that was until he kept saying that the teacher had a giant guat every single day when he came home from school. I told him that he would have to tell me what the word meant or. I would take away his iPad he just stood there still for a minute and then told me that it meant good personality. I thought that was so sweet and. I even bought him ice cream fast forward to now and. I've just received a report from the school about my son screaming. Gat to the teacher it turns out my son was lying about what the word meant and it actually meant something much worse. I can't believe that he would say anything like this and. I'm absolutely heartbroken.

My son got revenge on his bully we started hearing my son was being bullied constantly in school because of a huge birth mark on his shoulder and after one day when this bully tried to cut the birth mark off we took him out of school unfortunately this same jerk somehow knew our address and would often wait outside our house just to taunt him we tried going to the police but they refused to do anything as they didn't consider it a serious matter we didn't see him for a while so we thought it was over but then this kid found out my son had been named. MVP on his soccer team the next day he decided to throw a brick through our living room window and climb into our house with the intention of hurting my son he got into our house and started searching for him while calling out his name what he didn't know is that my son who was scared sheis was thankfully in his room with his older brother who happened to be holding my cocked firearm he was now upstairs kicking open each door calling out how bad he was going to hurt him he got to my son's room and flung open the door ready to do who knows what he was immediately met with two rounds straight to the chest my sons were 13 and 14 at the time and weren't charged it was ruled as self-defense.

My husband divorced me because we found out during my checkup and screening tests that our baby won't be normal and that he will have. Down syndrome. I can remember the horror in my husband's face when we went back home he told me that we should get rid of it and try again and. I told him that. I will never do that and it is our baby he threatened me with divorce if. I don't do it. I stood my ground and said. I'd rather have a divorce rather than have my son to have a father like him we went through divorce during my second year of college it was very difficult but my family was there to support way before. I gave birth he already got a new girl and he got her pregnant he sent me a text saying that their baby is healthy unlike mine and told me how unlucky. I was. I just blocked him and thought that no matter what. I will love my baby and will protect him from anything fast forward to giving birth my son came out and he was 100% normal my delivery doctor told me that it is common to get misdiagnosed. I cried so hard because my faith was tested after a few months the sister of my ex visited me and told me that my ex's new baby was unfortunately diagnosed at. Birth for. Down syndrome my ex was. Furious and left the delivery room and he never claimed the baby as his.

My baby sister called me dad. I was 20 when my sister was born now. I am 30 and she is 10 our mom wasn't in a good place physically or mentally and my sister's father was a druggie so. I took her in and have been raising her ever since. I have even legally adopted her. I did my best to raise her and also completed my college at the same time. I avoided all the partying dating and socializing in my 20s to look after her and worked multiple jobs so. I could afford diapers and baby food in certain ways. I have always seen her as a daughter even though she is my sister the love. I have for her would be the love a father has for his kid. I watched her grow up and was there for every single. Milestone most would consider me to be my sister's dad but my sister grew up with the knowledge. I am her big brother and the reason. I take care of her is our mom and her dad can't take care of her the way they should she got more information as she got older yesterday she had a fever my sister has chronic asthma and when sick her asthma is worse at like 3:00 a.m. I heard her coughing in her sleep so. I got her nebulizer to give her a breathing treatment. I had to wake her up to take it she was half asleep and when she finished. I told her she could go back to sleep she mumbled okay then as. I was leaving her room she said thank you. Dad.

My girlfriend had a crush on this waiter for a few years so. I dumped her recently. I went away with my girlfriend's family to their holiday home while in the car her mom says oh are you excited to see him in a teasing sort of voice my girlfriend started getting embarrassed and everyone laughed her dad told me how she had a crush on one of the people who work in a restaurant they always go to when we get there everyone wants to go straight to the restaurant but my girlfriend says she wants to shower because she wants to look nice she takes 3 hours to get ready to do her makeup and hair when we get to the restaurant her family greets all the staff but my girlfriend just stands there waiting then. I hear someone shout from the back room look at whose baby it is he comes out and greets my girlfriend and she's bless he carries on working and. I ask her why she has called his baby she says that it was a joke they had throughout the night. I kept seeing her staring at him. I text her to ask her to stop staring at him and she just denies doing it then a little while later he starts clearing a table and she walks over and starts helping she picks up the glasses and takes them to the bar and she's just chatting with him while he works we eventually leave and she goes over to him and says bye then gives him a quick hug so. I decided to break up with her mid- holiday and ruin it for her.

My mom got approached by a gang my mom was a sixth grade teacher in the roughest part of. Compton in one of her classes she had a group of guys who she knew all came from very poor families during lunch break they always. Drew pictures of fancy exotic cars my mom would always tell them how good they were and they all promised that she would be the first person they would take for a ride if they ever got a car many years later on a random day my mom was going home after finishing teaching for the day she was walking to her car when she saw a shady group of guys all leaned up against a car staring at her she was nervous so she tried to ignore them but as she got to her car she noticed all of them walking up to her she could see all of them were visibly dressed part of a gang and had weapons one of the guys said. Mrs we're here to take you for a ride she was terrified of being kidnapped so she went to grab her pepper spray just as she did this one of the guys calmed her down and said they were the five boys she taught years ago after that they took her to a really fancy restaurant in their. Cadillac and paid for her meal.

When. I won the lottery my wife divorced me to get half of it but she didn't count on one thing at the beginning of my marriage my parents were against it they said that she had been married three times before and got divorced whenever her husbands achieved something valuable. I ignored them and still got married a few months ago when. I was at my parents house. I bought a lottery ticket and. I won the prize of $3 million when. I got back home. I told my wife the next day she disappeared a few days later. I received divorce papers however in my country you can only play the state lottery if you live in the state and. I used my mother's name to play my mother said she would only cash it out when the divorce is finalized yesterday we had the divorce court ex-wife was mocking saying how foolish. I was to believed her finally when the judge finished listing the assets of course he never mentioned. Lottery my ex wife was confused and asked about it he said there was no. Lottery at that point she started making a scene that's when my lawyer said that. I his client didn't have any lottery in my name my parents had signed the ticket so the money belonged to them she turned pale after hearing this.

My mother saved my life when. I was 16 I had a heated argument with my parents they wouldn't let me go to a sleepover that everyone else was attending my boyfriend was there and his ex had joined last minute which made me feel even more upset. I was humiliated and angry convinced that they were the worst parents ever my mom who has always been highly intuitive warned me not to go saying she had a bad feeling about it but. I was too stubborn to listen. I kept calling my friends begging them to pick me up but they said. I was too far away and that maybe next time while. I sulked at home my friends decided to go for a joy ride after the party they were drinking driving and speeding down the road in one of their dad's. SUVs filming it all on. Snapchat. I saw how much fun they were having and kept leading with my parents to let me go finally my dad gave in and decided to drop me off at my friend's house as we arrived my friend's parents came running out the front door. Panic stricken they told us that the group had been in a terrible accident the. SUV had crashed into the back of a trailer truck and the car went right under it all seven of them passed away instantly looking back my mom's intuition saved my life that night if it wasn't for my mom. I wouldn't be alive today.

My obsessive cousin keeps trying to copy me so. I lied about being pregnant when. I was younger. I used to do everything with my cousin we styled our hair the same liked the same singers and tried to match outfits with each other however as we grew up she always tried to outdo me and say how much better she was than me last year my fiance proposed to me and. I was overjoyed and told my family including my cousin she seemed kind of upset about it 3 weeks later. I discovered my cousin was engaged and going to be married soon recently my mom told me the day she wanted to get married was the same day my fiance and. I decided. I was upset and asked her about it she replied by saying that. I should stop being jealous. I tried to tell my family about how strange and unfair it was but they all told me. I was overreacting. I decided to tell my cousin. I was pregnant just to see what she would do 2 weeks later she also announced she was pregnant the next day my cousin called me asking to go baby stuff shopping and. I replied that. I couldn't go. I talked to her mom and she told me that my cousin admitted to pretending to be pregnant and her fiance left her because of it.

My mom abandoned us so we abandoned her back when. I was 18 I found out my mom was messaging someone online who lived in another state one day she decided to fly over there and meet him she was supposed to stay for a week and at first. I thought it was awesome that. I'd have the whole house to myself but then one week turned into two then three then eventually it had been a month since. I last saw my mom everyone kept asking me when she'd be back but she never gave a definitive answer after about 2 months. I got a call from her telling me that she was staying over there and that. I was now in charge of the house which meant. I had to pay all the bills by myself. I refused but she insisted. I pay them since she was no longer living here. I told her she needed to come back and do something with the house because it was under her name and not my respons possibility after that she hung up on me and wouldn't answer my calls or texts no matter how many times. I tried to reach her. I ended up packing my things and went to my dad's house when the bills started rolling in she sent me all the links to payment sites but. I ignored them when she saw. I didn't end up paying them she called me screaming telling me. I was irresponsible and that. I'd get in trouble for not paying them. I told her once again that those bills weren't my responsibility especially since. I was already living with. Dad now she said she hopes. I end up homeless on the streets and hung up.

Parents kicked me out at 16 to make room for my sister's new baby big mistake. I turned 16 a week ago but instead of a celebration my parents kicked me out the reason my older sister. Amanda who is 7 months pregnant our house has four bedrooms and my parents decided my room should go to. Amanda's baby they sat me down on my birthday and informed me. I was moving to my aunt's house because. I was old enough to move out my parents have always favored. Amanda and barely cared for me but this was shocking they promised to take care of my expenses until. I turned 18 but insisted. I couldn't stay with them when. I asked why the guest room couldn't be the nursery they said it was for. Amanda's boyfriend essentially my parents had a room. Amanda and her boyfriend had a room and the baby would get its own room. Amanda wasn't home likely to avoid feeling guilty we've never been close but. I didn't think she would support this arrangement. I was deeply disappointed especially on my birthday but. I accepted it my parents lack of love was something. I had come to terms with after the conversation. I packed my things my parents helped likely to speed up the process they drove me.

My whole class cheated and. I think. I'm the only one that got away with it one time in college one of my older professors accidentally stapled answer sheets to the back of every test a few minutes after all the tests were handed out the teacher took a phone call and stepped outside at that point everyone noticed the answer sheet and we decided to keep quiet and just tear it off when we were done all the questions were multiple choice answers except the last one that said answers will vary once. I was done with the test. I went to the podium to turn it in but. I was curious about what other people wrote for the last question so. I decided to discreetly take a look at some of them. I kid you not all of the tests. I looked at literally said answers will vary as their actual answers. I stood there. Frozen for a second not believing college kids could be so stupid anyways. I passed my test and was never called back. I didn't know anybody in that class and this was my last test before. I graduated so. I never found out if they got caught or not.

My daughter has been dating her boyfriend for 2 years now before meeting him my daughter strictly told me not to mention his dad or any family members to him as he is not close with them. I didn't ask what happened and. I respected what she had told me genuinely. I liked him a lot he is a good guy responsible and truly loves my daughter we got along well though. I only met him a handful of times a few days ago my daughter came to visit me along with him. I was fixing my car and he looked curious and asked what. I was doing. I told him. I was doing basic maintenance like changing the oil and checking tire pressure that sort of thing we got into talking and he told me he doesn't know even the basics when it comes to taking care of a car let alone fixing it he always just paid a mechanic to do it. I was shocked. I told him. I could teach him a couple of things if he really wanted to know he doesn't need to waste his money on fixing basic things he was a fast learner and picked up what. I was telling him to do after he was done. I patted his back and said well done my son the expression on his face changed one second he was happy and the next his mood was completely different he broke down crying on the floor what.

Are your children allowed to go in the refrigerator whenever they want not exactly we raised an only child so it was just her no siblings. I don't know if this would work with multiple kids when my daughter was little we kept pre-pre stuff like cut fruit and veggies and a drawer in the fridge and single served snacks in a specific bin in the pantry that was hers for the taking anytime even in the middle of the night or right before dinner it always had something as she got older the rules changed starting around third grade she was able to prepare her own fruit veggies and sandwiches snack food like chips sweets and juice boxes were portioned out by the week and stocked on. Thursdays when. I did my grocery run if she ate all of the chips and sweets in a few days there wouldn't be any left for. Wednesday so she learned to. Pace herself at around age 12 she was responsible for adding her stuff to the shopping list specifically what she wanted for snacks and lunch at first we prompted her but gradually stopped until it became if it wasn't on the list we didn't buy it if what she put on the list was unusual or outside the budget we discussed it by 15 we gave her a budget for her own items like shampoo snacks we didn't eat soda fancy water. Etc she had to shop for herself with the provided money this helped her learn to regulate herself and manage real world responsibilities food isn't unlimited after all we might be terrible parents but when she moved into the dorms and later her own apartment she already knew how to do those things.

What's the craziest thing you witnessed as a kid but didn't realize until you were older when. I was a kid all the kids would sleep in the basement on. Christmas. Eve to give space for. Santa to drop off the presents that night there was a lot of noise coming from outside on the street but we couldn't see anything because there was snow covering the egress windows my mom came downstairs and told us to stay there but soon we heard sirens and saw police lights reflecting in the snow there was a lot of commotion that we couldn't see then my dad came downstairs with the very real. Santa. Claus he told us that his sleigh crashed in the snow and that the kind police officers were helping him get unstuck and while they were working he was visiting the kids in the neighborhood he pulled out a present for each of us and sat with my family while we opened them and sang a few. Christmas songs when things calmed down outside he went back to delivering toys years later. I learned that there was a large gang fight outside of our house and that a few people died right outside an older man from our church lived down the road and knowing my parents had undoubtedly scared children at home put on a. Santa suit and came over once the police arrived. Santa was a hero to me as a child but that man is a hero to me now.

Deaf people what are some things you thought were silent but later found out they weren't my best friend is deaf he also has two older brothers who are deaf when they were growing up the two older brothers thought their mom was magic because whenever she went to the front door someone was always outside it's like she could summon someone there whenever she wanted the two brothers would try everything day after day to try and see if they could make someone appear at the front door their mom asked them why they were messing with the front door so much and they said that they are trying to figure out how she makes people appear at the front door. They begged her to show them the trick of how she did it she opened the front door took them outside turned them around and said see this button that's called a doorbell when someone comes to the door they push it and it makes a sound inside then. I go to the door and let them in it was the biggest mindblowing moment for them and it's a classic story in their family.

What are your kids currently attempting to hide from you one a few years ago. I was going through my son's thirdd grade backpack and found a can of ravioli that's not much except. I never bought any ravioli when. I asked him about it he burst into tears and pulled out a box under his bed filled with ravioli he then proceeded to tell me how this girl that picks on him and says they are married gives him ravioli every day and makes him take it. I can just picture this girl's mother telling her the way to a man's heart is through his stomach two. I just found out that my 6-year-old locks the bathroom door so he can get some privacy last night. I looked across the kitchen to see the door slightly open and my son in there he was doing push-ups. I didn't say anything just watched him finish his five reps. Flex in the mirror and then walk out of the bathroom three fortunately my teenager doesn't try to hide much from me she's a terrible liar and gets busted right away every time so she just casually admits stuff these days it's pretty great however she's been sneaking her boyfriend over to the house during the day while. I'm at work and thinks. I'm clueless four my six-year-old son takes a poo in the backyard every morning and blames it on the dog.

What did a teacher do that made you automatically gain respect for them my. English teacher in high school asked where my homework was. I said. I forgot to do it and he said to the rest of the class why can't you guys be like. Chris he doesn't come up with some excuse he just tells me he didn't do it in my first year of high school my class decided to play a simple prank on our. English teacher by all laughing when he faced the board and then stopping every time he turned around to face us after a few minutes of this he just left the classroom without a word we all sat there confused until a few minutes later the assistant principal comes in and explains that we've really upset our teacher he made us believe we'd seriously messed up then our teacher walked in and pretty much went gotcha one of my. High. School. Math teachers had a policy that you could retake any test as many times as you needed to no penalties and she would help tutor you during any study hall or before or after school or during lunch. I asked her why she is doing all of this and she said. I'm a teacher and my job is to teach you 2 days ago a teacher was 5 minutes late to the start of an 8: a.m. lecture she started by apologizing for the delay and explaining that she just got off the phone with her sister telling her that her mother just died of cancer her lectures for the day were canceled but she was going to try to keep it together enough to do hours since we were there so early in the morning.

What is something funny you say to scammers instead of hanging up one. I say hello oh hey can you hold on someone's at the door put the phone down and see how long they stay on my record is 17 minutes two. I never did this but a while ago. I was hanging out with this person when they got called by a scammer he gave the scammer this weird foreign name after spelling the name my friend asked the scammer to spell back the name to be sure he got it right every time he spelled it my friend said he forgot to add a letter at the end after 5 minutes we heard the scammer mutter. F this three. I once had a scammer say he's from. Microsoft support telling me that my computer had a virus. I told them that. I loved my viruses and. I was happy they were in my computer the guy said go have fun with your virus for my wife cracks up every time. I use the nicest most polite voice. I can and. I say thank you so much for calling hey can you hang on one second while. I hang up on you five. I have full conversations with them. I dragged one on so long he was trying to mirror my computer when he told me to type in the site he asked what. I saw on the page and. I was like your mom.

Today. I effed up by confiscating my son's game boy and hiding it for 18 years my son wasn't doing his homework so. I confiscated his. Game. Boy. Advance. I told him he'd get it back next week well he's a clever dude and knew all my usual hiding places so. I put it someplace he'd never look except. I had suffered a traumatic brain injury a few years earlier and forget stuff sometimes so when he finished his homework and asked for it back after a week. I couldn't find it ah. I looked everywhere well obviously not everywhere then we moved houses and. I still didn't find it 18 years later. I was donating some coats. I hadn't wor born in a long time and in the pocket of a viane trench coat from the 1930s. I found his. Game. Boy. Advance. I turned it on and it worked. Pokmon appeared. I put fresh batteries into it and handed it to my 28-year-old son he proceeded to laugh for a good 5 minutes then played it for a few hours.

The day the quiet kid made the whole class lose it smart nerdy quiet kid in the front of class you know the type always answers questions perfectly when called on one day the. Teacher. Calls on him and before he even gets a word out the teacher just lazily says correct and turns back around to write on the board the second the teacher's back is turned quiet kid suddenly. Rockets his pencil straight into the ceiling like a dart the teacher doesn't notice a thing it was such a shockingly bold move from the usually silent kid that the whole class froze in disbelief but by the time the teacher turned back around quiet kid was already back to his usual self cool as ice taking notes like nothing happened the teacher still clueless keeps on teaching meanwhile the whole class is barely holding it together trying so hard not to burst into laughter all while sneaking glances at the pencil stuck in the ceiling the tension is building but the teacher is oblivious a couple of. Giggles slip out and the teacher completely confused asks what's so funny every time the teacher asks the situation just gets funnier and then it happens the teacher turns around to continue the lesson still in the dark not even 2 seconds later the whole class finally loses it bursting into hysterical laughter the teacher spins around to see what's going on just as the pencil dislodges from the ceiling and lands right next to quiet kids notebook perfect timing.

One of my students dropped dead in my classroom and. I lied about what his last words were. I'm a middle school teacher and this happened on what seemed like an ordinary afternoon after lunch one of my students came into class drenched in sweat which was strange considering it was cold outside. I told him to wash up but something about him seemed off during a test he walked up to my desk looking dazed gripping his pencil like it was the only thing keeping him standing he stared at me confused and asked what music are you listening to. I told him the masam and the. Papas he didn't respond just looked even more out of it and whispered can. I call home before. I could react he collapsed right in front of me the school resource officer and nurse rushed in and within minutes an ambulance was on its way but. I already knew he wasn't breathing later when his parents contacted me they asked for every detail my principal was there as. I recounted the events when they asked about his last words. I told them but they misheard and thought he had asked to call his mama and papa the moment they broke down in tears. I couldn't bring myself to correct them they said he hadn't called them that since he was three he died from a brain aneurysm likely triggered by a head injury weeks earlier they cremated him and. I'll never forget that day.

I heard my husband talking to our daughter and now. I'm crying 9 months ago when we found out. I was pregnant my husband changed overnight he became intensely protective to the point where he'd carry me everywhere even if. I just wanted to go to the bathroom it was sweet at first but. I started feeling suffocated he kept telling me how terrified he was that something might happen to me or the baby. I tried to understand but it was overwhelming 2 days ago. I went into labor he was scared more scared than me his hands shook as he reassured me everything would be fine though. I could see the fear in his eyes after our daughter was born. I passed out from exhaustion when. I woke. I heard him talking softly to her. I kept my eyes closed and listened you have the prettiest mommy in the world he whispered she's strong kind and she saved me then he began confessing things. I never knew he told our newborn how his parents had been abusive how they would beat him for not being perfect and how they forced him into things he hated including college but then he met me he said that despite the pain he doesn't regret a single hardship because it led him to me lying there tears filled my eyes. I realized how blind. I had been to just. How. Deeply he loves me how much we had saved each other his love was always there stronger than. I had ever known and in that moment. I felt like the luckiest woman alive.

My parents are gold diggers my parents told me to not call them when. I was leaving our home for. University when. I returned home for. Christmas they were cold and didn't give me any gifts when the school year ended. I called my parents and got a disconnected number prompt. I panicked and eventually called my grandmother she told me my parents had moved away and she had their new number but wasn't supposed to give it to me until. I finished. University she then hung up leaving me with no money and nowhere to go. I had to sell all my belongings quickly and. I was homeless for a month mon. I limited my budget to less than 20% of my income and saved the rest after 25 years of struggles. I became a. VP of a software company 2 weeks ago. I saw my mother. I managed to stay stone-faced but she invited me to a dinner. I decided to go because. I wanted answers my dad said he had decided to leave me because. I was going after my hobby of software rather than being an accountant. I said at least my hobby made me a millionaire then they asked for $2 million for raising me and making me the man. I am.

A girl came skipping home from school one day mommy mommy she yelled we were counting today and all the other kids could only count to four but. I counted to 10 see 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 very good said her mother is it because. I'm blonde mommy yes it's because you're blonde her mother replied the next day the girl came skipping home from school mommy mommy she yelled we were saying the alphabet today and all the other kids could only say it to. D but. I said it to g c a b c d e. FG very good said her mother is it because. I'm blonde mommy yes pumpkin it's because you're blonde the next day the girl came skipping home from school mommy mommy she yelled we were in gym class today and when we showered all the other girls had flat chests but. I have these and she lifted her tank top to reveal a pair of 36 C's very good said her embarrassed mother is it because. I'm blonde mommy no honey it's because you're 25

A nun takes a taxi and notices the very handsome driver won't stop staring at her she asks him why he is staring and he replies. I have a question to ask you but. I don't want to offend you the nun answers my son you cannot offend me when you're as old as. I am and have been a nun as long as. I have you get a chance to see and hear just about everything well says the driver. I've always had a fantasy to have a nun kiss me the nun responds let's see what we can do about that number one you have to be single and number two you must be. Catholic the driver is very excited and says yes. I'm single and. Catholic the nun instructs okay pull into the next alley there the nun fulfills his fantasy with a kiss that would make a man blush when they get back on the road the cab driver starts crying concerned the nun asks my dear child why are you crying the driver confesses forgive me but. I have sinned. I lied and. I must confess. I'm married and. I'm not a. Catholic that's okay the nun smiles and says my name is. Gary and. I'm going to a. Halloween party.

Little. Johnny wakes up one night hearing noises from his parents' bedroom he opens the door to his parents' room and sees mom handcuffed to the bed's headboard dad ramming her from behind. Johnny screams dad turns to looks at him laughs and gives mom a slap on the bum for good measure. Johnny runs away screaming once dad has finished mom off he uncuff her she immediately says you better go tell. Johnny everything is okay the [__] he just saw could scar him for. Life dad rolls his eyes and begrudgingly agrees pulls on his robe and heads for. Johnny's room only to find it's empty he then heads for the. TV room but when he passes the guest room he notices the door is a jar noises coming from inside he opens the door to look in and sees. Granny on her hands and knees. Little. Johnny [__] her from behind dad screams. Johnny turns around looks at him and says yeah not so funny when it's your mom huh.

A woman starts dating a doctor before too long she becomes pregnant and they don't know what to do about 9 months later just about the time she is going to give birth a priest goes into the hospital for a prostate gland infection the doctor says to the woman. I know what we'll do after. I've operated on the priest. I'll give the baby to him and tell him it was a miracle do you think it will work she asks the doctor it's worth a try he says so the doctor delivers the baby and then operates on the priest after the operation he goes into the priest and says father you're not going to believe this what says the priest what happened you gave birth to a child but that's impossible. I just did the operation insists the doctor it's a miracle here's your baby about 15 years go by and the priest realizes that he must tell his son the truth one day he sits the boy down and says son. I have something to tell you. I'm not your father the son says what do you mean you're not my father the priest replies. I'm your mother the. Archbishop is your father.

A husband notices his wife's hearing is deteriorating and decides to visit her doctor for advice. I can't speak to my wife directly as she might find it offensive given our old age he says to the doc there's a simple trick you can try to determine her hearing explains the doctor simply ask her a question at a distance and if she doesn't hear you move slightly closer and ask again until she does that night the husband arrives home and sees his wife in the kitchen cooking he thinks to himself what a perfect opportunity to test her hearing he stands stands in the doorway of the kitchen and promptly asks what's for dinner honey no answer he moves closer what's for dinner honey still no answer he moves even closer what's for dinner honey still his wife doesn't answer he now sees how serious her hearing problem is at this point he is stood right next to his wife what's for dinner honey for the fourth time we're having chicken.

What the most disgusting thing you did because you were horny when. I was 15 I was invited to a friend's party where the ratio was three girls for each guy the main reason that this happened is because our class was filled with geeks and by that time. I believe a. World of. Warcraft had just gone live and no living teenager of our. Circle would skip that except for me so basically it was me four guys and 15 kinky girls playing around smelling good as hell and they teased us like no tomorrow but. I never got any action. I had more horniness built up than. I've ever had in my life after arriving at home. I was desperate to explode my ball somewhere there were so many hormones running through my system but at that moment my hand would not suffice. I needed something better so. I went to the refrigerator to find some butter to use as a hand lotion or something but then. I saw it the shape wet and moist. I just took it from the fridge cleaned it and then. I heated it in the microwave it was weird but still the best solo nut. I've ever had. I nutted in a squid the post-nut clarity hit like a freight train it was like someone else had taken over my body and. I suddenly awoke to find myself naked in my kitchen with my schlong deep inside a squid now. I also had to eliminate the evidence. I probably could have just threw the squid out but the risk of one of my parents finding it was too much for me to handle so. I grabbed a shovel went out into my backyard and dug a hole. I put the warm. Squid inside a trash bag and buried it to this day the squid is still buried in my parents backyard with my. DNA deposited within. When. I visit home. I often find myself gazing at that corner of my backyard and. I'm tortured by the knowledge of what. I did.

What's the craziest thing you have stuck your pickle into wasn't me but. I saw it happen my buddy came over for a sleepover when we were 11 and we talked about how we both discovered using our hands. I'm like the. Jets and the jacuzzi feel so good he like that's nothing the vacuum feels better what the hell do you mean the vacuum. I questioned he tells me that he sticks his pickle in the end of the vacuum and lets it literally makes him cross the finish line new to this whole hand thing. I'm intrigued and ask him to demonstrate now we have an in-house vacuum and. I'm pretty sure he was used to a shitty little plug in vacuum he sticks his pickle in the vacuum turns it on and it immediately sucks tied to the base of his pickle he's screaming bloody murder but. I can't help him turn it off because the power switch is on the handle and he's rolling all over the floor when. I finally managed to turn it off there is blood all over his junk. I'm like we need to get my mom she's a nurse he protests and says this has happened before what do you mean you've got a bloody pickle from sticking your it in a vacuum before and you still did it again after. I finally convince him to let me tell my mom she comes home and takes him to the hospital he tore his fulum and basically poorly circumcised himself moral of the story is you can be vacuumed off too hard.

What is the most cruel thing a family member has done to you oh boy here it goes when. I was about 20 my cousin. Julie announced that she would be getting married my mom came to me and tearfully explained that. Julie wanted me to wear our recently deceased grandmother's wedding dress a pink tea length dress so that it would be like a part of my grandmother was at the ceremony it had to be me because my grandmother was very slim and. I was the smallest person in our family. I agreed. I tried on the dress and it was too tight way too tight my mother told me to starve myself and don't put a single thing in that mouth. I did. I starved myself stupid for 3 months. I was sickly pale had dropped about 20 lbs from my already slender frame and had constant headaches but the dress fit my mother kept telling me how great. I looked we flew to the wedding my family lives across the country everyone was shocked at my appearance but said nothing the day of the wedding came and. I appeared in my grandmother's wedding dress. I thought people were acting strangely towards me but. I didn't think too much of it. I found out later that. Julie had not asked for me to wear the dress she knew nothing about it my mother had been telling people that. I was on drugs not true to get attention and sympathy she convinced me to drop weight and show up to. Julie's wedding in my dead grandmother's wedding dress to show everyone how drugged out and unstable. I had become in order to get more attention and sympathy.

What secret could ruin your life this secret came out a while ago but it still hurts and is a big secret. I've not told anyone when. I was a kid. I had asthma pretty bad so. I'd be up all night coughing constantly my mom and. I lived with her parents we shared a room so. I slept in her bed often when. I was a toddler mom would come home from work and lay down for bed but. I'd keep her awake with my coughing sometimes at night. I'd be coughing and she would hug me so tight that. I couldn't breathe it would really distress me that. I couldn't breathe but. I knew mom loved me so much and. I didn't want to tell her she was literally squeezing me to death because. I was afraid of hurting her feelings so. I'd just tell her that. I loved her so much and she would cry pretty hard after that took me years after having my own kid and treating him gently to figure out that it's actually pretty difficult to squeeze a kid so hard that they couldn't breathe mom is bipolar and has had other incidents of hurting people and abandoning those in her care that need medication and can't take care of themselves so. I finally put it together and figured out mom would be so agitated with my asthma that she would try to stop me from coughing by squeezing me almost to death and then she would cry out of guilt when. I told her. I loved her.

Today my. Nextdoor pregnant neighbor knocked on my door around 700 p.m. I heard some knocking on my door and opened it to find my next door pregnant neighbor standing there she appeared to be in her seventh or eighth month of pregnancy she was holding a small plate in her hand and spoke in a very shy voice asking me if. I could give her some of whatever. I was cooking because she liked the smell. I think pregnant women sometimes have strong. Cravings that they cannot resist despite being shy she apologized a lot for her request probably because we don't know each other well. I laughed and reassured her that it was okay. I explained that. I was cooking a traditional meal from my country which included olive oil garlic jalapenos and some spices giving it a nice smell. I happily shared some of my dinner with her and after thanking me she left as. I watched her walk home she reminded me of a cute little penguin happy with her successful little. Hunting. Expedition for some reason. I felt really happy too.

What rule at your school backfired horribly my high school was trying to prevent a senior prank since the class before us had got a little out of hand they warned us that anyone who did anything will be in trouble so somebody has an idea what if we do an antique prank every senior was going to bring a potentially threatening item for a senior prank and do nothing with it somebody has the idea that we should all bring a gallon jug of water with us to class the teachers freaked out and there is an announcement that they are going to start taking up the water jugs for fear of what we are going to do with them the student are resentful and not wanting to give up their precious water but alas most of the jugs have been confiscated so the students are taking to social media tons of tweets and mentions are going out to local news stations school is confiscating all water not allowing students to drink water you get the picture before the end of the day two different news reporters were at our school guess we had the last laugh after all.

What made the high school legend become a legend we had a teacher who was. Infamous for not letting you go to the bathroom no matter what. I mean so much so that if you accidentally started your period in class she'd make you wait this actually happened so there was a girl who will call. Katie in class who tended to be a bit of a troublemaker. Katie hated that teacher because she begged to go to the bathroom and got shut down every time at the end of the year. Katie asked one more time to go to the bathroom the teacher said no. Katie asked another time 5 minutes later the teacher said no again 5 minutes after that. Katie asked again the teacher hit the roof and said that if she said one more thing. Katie would be sent to the principal. Katie. Shrugged and said this is on you then and pissed on her seat right where she was the teacher sent her to the principal who called her parents one of which was a urologist her father yelled at the principal the teacher ended up in deep according to other kids she never denied another kid the bathroom again.

What's the biggest. I'm a princess red flag. I really like this girl in high school she literally took my breath away. I thought she was so beautiful. I did odd jobs in order to save up enough money to take her on a proper date date night rolls around and. I go to pick her up and two of her female friends are coming with us which. I had no idea about we get to the movie theater and they don't have any money so. I am paying for all four of us. I was careful with my purchase so. I had money left for the dinner movie ends and. I explain that dinner really needs to be just the two of us and she basically tells me that's not happening as a result we end up having to go to this greasy spoon little dive in a strip mall. I got to be honest by the end of the night. I was struggling to hold back tears. I was ashamed but even more. I was angry this girl had no idea how hard. I had worked in order to treat her to a nice date but she taught me a valuable lesson people who complain about things given to them for free are literally the worst people in existence same for people who show no consideration for the feelings and expectations of others both are huge red flags.

I love destroying my ex emotionally with kindness me and my ex were together until she found someone better her new boyfriend is unemployed and she supports him since then every time. I see her. I destroy her with kindness. I ask her how she is and how she feels whenever. I see her in a club. I flirt with her friends they usually flirt back or. DM me but. I'm just doing it for fun once or twice a month. I bring her something to her work candy or coffee and always just make her question her feelings about me. I know every time. I do this she told her boyfriend and it makes him mad but she never told me the only way. I know it is because her friends told me few times. I met her in a club or bar drunk she told me how her mom liked me and still talks about me every time. I see her. I'm just kind and. I'm trying to get inside her head to question what she did few times she just cried when she saw me and told me how she missed me. I only gave her a hug and left her. I will never take her back. I just don't like cheating and. I want her to remember that what she did was horrible every step of the way only thing. I want is to break her how she broke me and remember to be better.

Lawyers what was your o crap moment in court. I finished a murder trial. I was representing the defendant the only defense. I had was that there was no body found. I knew. I was going to lose the case so for my closing argument. I looked at my watch and. I told the jury the victim is going to walk through that door in a minute the entire jury looked over at the door waiting for the person to walk through of course the person did not walk through. I then told the jury look you had to have had some reasonable doubt that my client did it because you were waiting for the victim to walk through the door that's it that was my closing argument well guess what the jury came back with a guilty verdict. I asked the jury after what happened. I said you all looked at the door the jury said yeah we all did look at the door but guess who did not your client.

Who's the biggest attention seeker you've ever met in high school. Julie was the kind of girl who craved male attention she would often poke fun at us her actual friends just to get the guys to laugh after she spilled one of my embarrassing secrets to some boys we kicked her out of our friend group guys are more fun to hang out with anyway girls are all drama she said when prom season arrived. Julie planned her meanest stunt yet she asked the kid with no friends to prom you could see how thrilled he was that a girl had asked him out but we knew better. Renee the only one in our group who was still on decent terms with. Julie asked her why she had really invited. The. Loner turns out. Julie had no intention of showing up her plan was to humiliate the unpopular kid by standing him up. Renee told the guys and since they weren't fond of. Julie either they weren't going to let it happen one of the popular guys asked. Julie to prom instead to spare the kid from embarrassment naturally she accepted but when prom day came. Julie showed up only to discover that her date had stood her up she ended up in the exact situation she had planned for that kid and she left the school in tears.

Have you ever seen a doctor yell at their patient. I was that doctor. I yelled loudly not at the patient but at her aunt. I was working in the. ER and a little kid around 10: or 11: came in late one evening she had a massive blow to her skull and was having seizures it was all bloody but surprisingly she was conscious her aunt was very caring and hovered over us she told me the girl fell off a bike. I pacified her and told her to wait outside while. I provided. Primary. Care to the child before transferring her to a higher. Care. Center when the aunt was outside. I asked the girl what happened her aunt had hit her in the head with a hammer that vile lady had hit her 10-year-old niece in the head with a hammer. I was horrified and enraged. I was mad. I stabilized her came out and called the anunt inside as soon as. I saw her. I just lost it. I yelled at her at the top of my lungs. I don't even remember all that. I said but it lasted long enough for the ward boys nurses and ambulance driver to gather it also lasted long enough for the aunt to break down and confess. I called the girl's parents and they called the police and registered the complaint my behavior was unprofessional but. I have never regretted it. I don't usually lose my cool but. I'm glad. I did that day.

As a police officer what situation made it hard for you to keep a straight face my partner and. I responded one night to a domestic dispute in the projects we had to reconfirm the address because we knew the couple and had never had any trouble with them we get to the apartment and can hear the guy. Big. Joe screaming at his wife calling her all sorts of vile names oh boy here we go bang bang bang open up. Housing. Authority silence we hear the chains rattling on the door and the locks being undone the door opens and before us stands. Joe's wife in a pink teddy huge. Tears. In. Her. Eyes did he hurt you where is he no she says and points towards the bedroom and then she starts balling again. I turn to my partner and say you deal with her. I'll go see. Joe. I get to the bedroom door and. Joe sees me what the f do you want. Joe is naked as a jbird handcuffed hands and feet to the bed right about that time. I hear my partner say she lost the key. I had a hard time suppressing a grin as. I held up my own cuff key and said. I don't want anything but. I'm betting you'll like this suffice to say his attitude changed quickly not all the domestics were disasters this one was hilarious.

My parents make me take a blood bath once a year. I found out why every year the night before my birthday my parents fill the bathtub with thick red liquid and. I have to soak in it. I never liked it my mom would lead me to the tub and my dad would sit on the edge checking the temperature they'd pour the liquid all over me making sure. I was completely covered then. I had to wait for it to dry leaving my skin tight and sticky the next morning on my birthday. I'd shower it off watching the red wash down the drain after that everything was normal presents cake and birthday fun. I never thought about how weird it was just assumed it was some family tradition when. I was about to turn 10 I was excited for my party. I invited all my neighborhood friends including my best friend. Emma a few days before she asked if we could hang out the day before my birthday. I told her no explaining that's the night. I have to take my yearly bath she looked confused so. I added you know the red bath. I take every year it's gross gets sticky and my parents say. I have to do it. Emma's face went pale wait red like blood she asked horrified. I Shrugged and said. I guess it kind of looks like blood my parents say it's just a family tradition the next day the whole neighborhood knew. Emma had told everyone and now they were calling me a vampire. I got asked if. I drank blood too that night. I asked my parents why they made me do it turns out it's an old family ritual for good luck.

Has anyone ever been to a wedding where someone actually objected and if so how did that go it was my friend's wedding everything seemed perfect until the groom's parents stood up mid ceremony they started speaking in a different language and most guests were still smiling unaware of what was really happening but the groom wasn't smiling his face told the whole story his parents didn't approve of the. Bride they believed she wasn't from the right class for their son and they were making their feelings known right there in front of everyone the priest who had been warned this might happen calmly asked the groom you've heard what your parents have to say what do you want to do without hesitating the groom looked at his bride and said. I want to marry her the priest turned to the parents and got them kicked out as they walked out they said you're not my son anymore. Whispers filled the hall and some guests even called out telling the parents they should be ashamed the groom was heartbroken to see his parents leave like that but he stayed strong and continued the wedding that was 30 years ago the couple is still together today with two beautiful children.

What made you instantly realize your friend is not a real friend back in high school. I had a long-term bully and one day during lunch he threw a rock the size of my fist straight at my back. I went down instantly screaming in pain. I thought my friends who were right there with me would help instead they all burst out laughing one even joked it looked like you'd been shot. I couldn't believe it. I was on the ground struggling and the people. I trusted most thought it was funny but then something unexpected happened the most feared guy in my school someone who never really interacted with me came running over he saw what had happened and thought it was unacceptable he helped me to the medical room while my friends stayed back laughing when. I returned to school the next day after going to the hospital and filing a police report some of those same friends thought it would be hilarious to poke the giant bruise on my back they didn't even ask if. I was okay they just kept laughing it wasn't until years later after starting therapy that. I fully understood how much that incident hurt me not just physically but emotionally.

What's the biggest lie you were told as a child when. I was 12 I was sent upstairs and told not to come down the rest of the night a week later my dad moved out of state for an amazing job where he would make six figures and send us a lot of money months later he stopped calling me it broke my heart but. I knew dad was busy and didn't have time to call. Weeks. Later things like jewelry started disappearing but. I never figured out why my mom started not eating some days because she was fasting on my birthday she took me to. Pizza. Express but again she wasn't hungry. I'm now 19 and it turns out my dad lied to me and was in so much that the police came to our house to arrest him so they sent me to my room this six figed job was him fleeing the country and leaving my mom with his debt so my mom started pawning her jewelry and we were so poor she starved some days just to feed me the. Pizza. Express was her using a voucher that got me pizza for $8 and although she was under a lot of stress and starving she had free tap water. I can't believe how my mom got through this while giving me lovely memories of laughing at dinner and taking me to the park.

Teachers has a student ever made you cry when. I was younger. I had a student in my class who was a huge bully but there was something strange about him from what. I could see he constantly disrupted class made fun of weaker kids got into fights and stole things but the more. I paid attention to his behavior. I noticed he was deeply insecure and afraid of something. I started acting nicer to him something all the other teachers didn't think to do once. I started doing this he started disrupting my class less and less one day he was in detention and out of the blue started opening up to me he told me that 2 years ago his father went inan he un alived his mother and then himself he told me that after this he couldn't handle his emotions and started causing harm to others as a coping mechanism he told me he had never told anyone else this before he didn't have any real friends and none of the teachers liked him for the rest of the year. I made sure to check up on him regularly and help him with his schoolwork on the final day of class he wrote me a note he thanked me for everything. I did and told me. I changed his life. I helped him realize he had severe mental problems and needed guidance 32 years later. I still keep that note in my wallet.

What's the nicest thing you've seen a gang do my mom was a sixth grade teacher in the roughest part of. Compton in one of her classes she had a group of guys who she knew all came from very poor families during lunch break they always. Drew pictures of fancy exotic cars my mom would always tell them how good they were and they all promised that she would be the first person they would take for a ride if they ever got a car many years later on a random day my mom was going home after finishing teaching for the day she was walking to her car when she saw a shady group of guys all leaned up against a car staring at her she was nervous so she tried to ignore them but as she got to her car she noticed all of them walking up to her she could see all of them were visibly dressed part of a gang and had weapons one of the guys said mrss we're here to take you for a ride she was terrified of being kidnapped so she went to grab her pepper spray just as she did this one of the guys calmed her down and said they were the five boys she taught years ago after that they took her to a really fancy restaurant in their. Cadillac and paid for her meal.

Waiters what's the cutest thing you've ever seen while serving a year ago. I was assigned a table by my manager and walked over when. I arrived. I saw two little seven-year-old kids on a date they both sat on high chairs kicking their feet and giggling. I myself couldn't hold in my smile because of how adorable they both were. I asked if. I could get them something to drink and the boy said after her. I then asked if they were ready for their appetizers the boy ordered muscles and the girl said she had never had muscles before me and the boy both convinced her to give them a try and when. I brought them out she loved them they both looked so happy together. I went over to the table behind them where both their mothers were sitting and told them that this was the most wholesome thing. I've ever seen they told me about how the kids were the same age grew up on the same street and have always had a huge crush on each other when. I went back they both asked for chicken strips and fries for their meal and even ordered a shared dessert my manager then told me to ask their moms if we could give them some non-alcoholic champagne to toast with both of them complimented my serving ate all the food drank their sparkling grape water and the boy gave me some coins as a tip. I'm dying to know where they are today.

Poor people who dated somebody. Rich what did you learn my ex-wife had a grandfather who was a billionaire when we would go to their house for holidays it was like being on another planet all of the different family members would try to get just a moment with the. King and kissed ass as much as possible. I didn't like the idea of this so. I just spent my time down in the main room playing with my kids next year again at. Christmas he seemed to like me and a week later. I got a call from him asking what he could do for my family. I told him. I didn't need any of his money but all. I want is for my kids to know their great grand father later that year he showed up at our house unexpectedly and spent the whole day telling my kids and. I stories about when he was a kid growing up he was truly an amazing guy for what he had gone through. I did eventually let him talk me into setting up a trust fund for my kids college to be paid for a few months later he told me that out of all of his close relatives he appreciated me the most because. I was the only one who never asked for anything other than for him to just be himself.

Teachers what's the best thing a student has ever said one year while teaching 8th grade. I had this really shy kid along with one of those stereotypical. Mean. Girls in one of my classes the girl would always be begging for attention blurting out stuff like you're probably my second least favorite teacher and would make fun of a lot of the other girls it bothered me when she would make fun of the shy kid because he reminded me of myself one day. I was doing a group project and decided to pair the two along with two other boys after a while. I noticed that the girl wasn't doing any work and was just talking with the two guys leaving all the work for the shy kid. I walked over and asked why he was doing all the work and the mean girl told me he was hogging all the work and not letting them do any. I knew this wasn't true so. I said that they could just do the rest since he did most of it already the girl said no it's okay he can do it he's a nerd anyways and got a laugh out of the boys. I then said to her you should be nice to him he could be your boss one day just after this with zero hesitation the shy kid finally spoke he said no thanks. I don't want to be a pimp when. I grow up.

How did the high school legend become a legend during one of our school dances it started hailing hard and the power went out everybody had to sit in the gym together waiting out the storm one of the teachers got the idea to have students start telling jokes to lighten the mood after a few jokes were told people started to lose interest then another kid got up he picked up the mic and just stood there after a few seconds he said so how deep are we willing to go guys just then all the students yelled balls deep and he was immediately removed from the stage and they stopped the joke telling for the night. I'm pretty sure he ended up getting s home for the night and didn't show up the next day pretty normal stuff. A year later at grad at the end of our ceremony the students had the chance to sing karaoke instead of telling jokes in the middle of a song the microphone suddenly disappeared as everyone was in their seats and one guy stood up laughing someone had handed him the missing microphone. I could hear teachers telling him not to do it while he kept laughing then he raised the microphone and simply said how deep for the first time. I understood school pride it was an amazing moment as almost 900 students all shouted balls deep.

What's your. Tinder horror story after a few weeks of texting a girl completely out of my league. I asked her out. I was shocked when she actually accepted she walked in and looked so beautiful. I literally went pale she greeted me with a smile and a hug and. I kept blushing like an idiot. I really enjoyed the date but had low hopes because. I thought she wouldn't be attracted to me however when. I walked her to the door at the end of our date she gave me the best kiss. I have ever gotten my heart stopped. I was in heaven fast forward a month or two we hung out a lot and. I was falling for her like nobody before out of nowhere she told me the we need to talk line and nothing could have prepared me for what she was about to say she looked at me and told me she has stage 4 cancer she then while trying not to cry said she'd understand if. I left. I was speechless after a minute. I ran my hands through her hair and told her. I loved her. I thought she was amazing and. I'd be honored to take this journey with her we held each other for the rest of the night over the next year. I lived a lifetime we traveled and completed her bucket list while crying a lot. N9 months ago she passed in my arms while. I sang her favorite song.

What's a loophole you use before anyone found out my childhood home was down the street from. Universal. Studios and. I went there every day after. Middle. School eventually we learned to go into the. VIP line for rides which nobody was ever in when the. GU stopped us and asked us for our. VIP tickets we would just say that. Dave should have called it in after about 5 Seconds of trying to verify every employee just gave up and let us through we did this so much that the employees knew us and would just let us go it was beautiful one day we decided to push it even further and snuck into the studio area after 5 minutes we were caught and questioned once again we just told them our fictional. Dave told us to come back there this time the guards took radio verification way more seriously until they got an actual. Dave on the line turns out. Dave was a production manager and gave us a weird look the security guards asked if we were with him and he said yes he took us aside and asked what we were doing and we said we just loved film and the studio atmosphere he loved that two young kids were interested in his job and took us all around the studio allowing us to sit in on recordings of different shows he gave us both a free pass to come back and. VIP line access.

People who have been in a coma what was it like my brother pranked me using flashing strobe lights and it caused me to have a seizure which put me into a coma the months. I spent laying in the hospital bed were terrifying. I was conscious but couldn't move. I heard everything around me from doctors telling my mom. I might not make it to my brother repeatedly apologizing through sobs all. I ever wanted to do was to tell my mom. I was okay and tell my brother. I forgive him but. I couldn't and that was torture the day. I woke up was horrifying. I shot up saw my girlfriend drop everything to the floor and then my heart stopped. I started flatlining and. The. Voice voes. I heard became duller and duller. I truly left my body and for the moments. My. Heart wasn't beating. I saw the hospital room from above my girlfriend sobbing to stay with her and doctors trying to bring me back and then something. I can only describe as. Divine came to me it spoke to me and gave me a choice to leave this place and go with it or to stay down here. I chose to stay and immediately gasped for air. I've never told anyone this. I'll take it to my grave.

Uber drivers what's your craziest experience. I picked up a girl from a bar on a. Wednesday night a few guys made sure she got in okay and after chatting for a bit. I could tell she was a very sweet girl she was absolutely wasted and apologized for being so drunk when she got in she asked me if instead of bringing her home. I could just drive around the city with the windows down for a while it was my last ride of the night so. I thought what the hell. I was worried she might throw up so. I took out my vomit bag just in case but no she just did the hand out the window airplane thing after a few minutes she asked me if. I had ever thought about dying. I replied yeah. I guess. I have that's when she told me she had cancer it was in her brain and they caught it way too late to start doing any treatment my heart dropped and. I had no idea what to say she told me she was dying but was going to be okay for the night she was at the bar that night celebrating a going away party for her work since all her co-workers were going to miss her she said she told them she was moving away but just didn't tell them that away was. Heaven she gave me a hug when. I dropped her off. I cried the whole way home.

Gamers of. Reddit what's the craziest thing you've heard over voice chat. I was midgame on. Call of. Duty with my friends when out of nowhere we could hear a guy with his mic on getting yelled at by his girlfriend we heard her say you are useless get off that stupid game and take me out to dinner after about 5 minutes of him trying to calm her down saying things like it's okay baby just give me a few minutes. I'm almost done and we can go. I can't leave mid game she just kept going she yelled if you don't leave right now and buy me dinner we're done one of us told him to just leave the game and it wasn't worth losing his girlfriend over we could hear as he typed in chat. BRB got to go break up with my girlfriend quick haha he must have thought he muted himself at that point we heard him stand up and yell back at her don't tell me what to do you live in my place don't pay for rent or food never want to do anything in bed you know what we are over get out after that it was a lot of her crying but the dude just didn't give a [__] he kept giving us call outs while she was trying to talk to him she left after a while and he sounded super relieved we're actually still friends and talk occasionally apparently he has a new girl and a kid.

When did a joke go way too far we had a kid in our class named. Luke who always made sure class wasn't boring every day he would joke around with teachers and other students but meant no harm everyone loved him we were sitting in class right after lunch and. Luke being the funny guy he was decided he was going to pull the chair out from underneath his friend when he got to class thinking it would be hilarious when he fell everyone was in class by this point except him and when he walked in we all knew what was about to happen he went to sit down and. Luke quickly pulled the chair perfectly a little too perfectly he fell back and hit his head on the corner of another desk hard the entire room went silent everyone was lost for words waiting to see if he was okay. Luke looking like he had just seen a ghost was trying to help him up when the kid said something that still gives me chills as he was trying to stand up he said why is it so dark in here turn the lights back on he was rushed to the hospital and found out he hid his head in a very certain way that caused him to lose his vision for. Life. Luke got into a lot of legal trouble because of this and even lost his scholarship.

What's the best time you've seen. Instant. Karma. I was in college just leaving my dorm building when. I noticed a frat guy in the parking lot making fun of someone who was clearly mentally challenged he was just trying to go inside when the. Frat guy stopped him made him get down on his knees and start cleaning his shoes. I was shocked when he actually started doing it he must have thought he was being nice or something then this piece of started pading him on the head while recording him calling him a good r word. I'm a pretty big guy so. I started to walk up to say something but just then someone else beat me to it this guy was absolutely massive he was around fo 6 had on an extra large tank top that barely fit him and looked like he could bench press my car he was stomping up to them and. I could tell he was seriously pissed off. I watched as he went up to the. Frat guy who was too busy laughing and recording to notice him and slapped him so hard across the head his entire 140lb body folded like a lawn chair he then helped a mentally challenged guy up and he gave him a hug the guy picked up the. Frat guy's phone pointed it towards him and made him start cleaning the mentally challenged guy's shoes every time he fought back he'd slap him on the head and tell him to get back to cleaning.

Parents of killers what happened we started hearing my son was being bullied constantly in school because of a huge birth mark on his shoulder and after one day when this bully tried to cut the birth mark off we took him out of school unfortunately this same jerk somehow knew our address and would often wait outside our house just to taunt him we tried going to the police but they refused to do anything as they didn't consider it a serious matter we didn't see him for a while so we thought it was over but then this kid found out my son had been named. MVP on his soccer team the next day he decided to throw a brick through our living room window and climb into our house with the intention of hurting my son he got into our house and started searching for him while calling out his name what he didn't know is that my son who was scared shitless was thankfully in his room with his older brother who happened to be holding my cocked firearm he was now upstairs kicking open each door calling out how bad he was going to hurt him he got to my son's room and flung open the door ready to do who knows what he was immediately met with two rounds straight to the chest my sons were 13 and 14 at the time and weren't charged it was ruled as self-defense.

Who's the dumbest person you've ever seen about a month ago my girlfriend was at home in our apartment when someone broke in after walking around for a bit and taking a few things thinking nobody was home he eventually flung our bedroom door wide open this immediately woke my girlfriend up the kid just stared at her for a second and then took off out of our apartment my girlfriend slammed the door shut and called me then the police. I rushed home as fast as. I could when. I got there. I made sure it was safe and we looked around to see if he took anything pretty upsetting at the time when we saw a few phones were missing and even some food out of our fridge but then we noticed a backpack on the couch that wasn't there before of course we opened it and inside we find all our missing stuff this kid's. ID and schoolwork with his and his parents' names on it which were probably the worst things he could have possibly left the cops came and we had a good laugh about it when taking a statement but no joke just as we were finishing we get a knock at the door. I open it and the same kid from the. ID was standing there he said um can. I have my bag back please the cop looked over at us all confused then my girlfriend nodded to him. I've never seen someone get grabbed and arrested faster.

Has a stranger ever saved your life when. I was 17 I was super naive and didn't think a stranger would ever actually try something on me but one night. I was at a bus stop when a very tall guy. I didn't recognize started talking to me. I didn't ignore him and was just being nice but then he started asking personal questions like if. I had a boyfriend immediate red flag after a few minutes he started moving closer and when. I tried to move away he quickly grabbed my hand. I tried pulling away but he tightened his grip and wouldn't let go eventually he managed to push me into a corner and started trying to put his hands on me. I was freaking out there was nobody around and. I didn't know what to do but just then the bus came and a young man got off he saw what was happening and we made eye contact he must have saw how scared. I looked he immediately intervened and said hey there you are. I've been looking for you everywhere who's this the creep then quickly put his hood up and walked away. I felt a huge wave of relief the guy then looked at me and asked if. I was okay but my heart was beating so fast. I could barely get the words out as. I thanked him afterwards we talked for a bit and found out we actually had one of the same classes together almost every day we sat together and. I thanked him for what he had done he saved me from what could have been a nightmare.

Fathers who went to get milk and never come back what happened when my wife and. I found out she was pregnant with twins. I had no other option but to work in a different country to support them while. I was gone. I didn't even consider what my life would be like when. I moved back and after 2 years. I came home we now lived in a different state where. I had no friends or family my wife completely changed and. I could barely handle the kids. I wasn't ready for this life that night when my wife came home we talked about the future together however. I had already made up my mind. I had some money saved and was going to leave it all for them the next morning. I told my wife. I had to run out to the store trying to keep it together my daughter overheard this and ran up to me she said daddy bring me home a surprise this. Hit me hard and it took everything not to break down right there. I could see her waving to me as. I pulled out of the driveway then. I just drove to a busy street and balded my eyes out for an hour that day. I walked back into my house with toys for my girls and a new ring for my wife. I could tell she thought it was odd but she never said anything about it from that day on. I got my together years later. I couldn't be happier with my family and leaving them would have been the biggest mistake of my life.

What lie could have ruined your life. I was driving home from work when. I pulled over to read a text from my wife. I was full of excitement when. I read she had just adopted a new puppy and was headed home then just as. I looked up another car smashed into me my car was destroyed. I faded. In and. Out. Of. Consciousness as. I watched the other girl get out of her car and literally run away from the scene. I was out for an unknown amount of time when. I woke up to a cop dragging me out of the wreck but instead of helping he started yelling and interrogating me. I was rushed to the hospital where he soon followed and while my broken neck was being assessed all. I could hear were his. Relentless questions weeks later. I found myself in court and the officer claimed. I pulled out in front of her. I had no memory of what happened and genuinely believed it was my fault my brother-in-law is a lawyer and sat in during the hearing something didn't sit right with him and he insisted on letting him take my case thank. God. I did within a week he dug up that the girl was driving without a license in a car she wasn't registered in and the officer was her uncle the court looked past all of this since. I didn't object to their claims turns out she was texting when she hit me and bribed her uncle when he found out.

What's the most heartbreaking thing you've ever seen when. I was 20 I worked at. Disneyland as one of the princesses you would see walking around the park. I loved my job spending the day making kids laugh and feel like they were in a fairy tale would leave me smiling every time one day however. I could barely keep it together it was a normal day when. I noticed two little kids holding hands they looked sad so. I tried to cheer them up. I got a little smile out of the boy but the girl just stared at the ground then one of my managers took me aside and told me something that broke my heart they were brother and sister and had a big family trip plan to come here but on the way their mom was in an accident and was now going to lose her life their dad was in the hospital so their uncle took them there for the day to try and distract them they weren't having much luck cheering up so far so. I knew what. I needed to do. I took a short break and prepared myself then. I went and found them we spent the day going on all the rides eating junk food and. I even managed to make them giggle a few times after we finished the day by watching fireworks the girl tugged my dress and told me this was the best day ever you're my favorite princess they walked away still holding hands while we all waved. I had to make sure she couldn't see me crying when she turned around to wave back. I'm just glad. I could shine some light into such a dark time for them.

What's the best revenge you've ever gotten my little brother was constantly coming home from school with new cuts and bruises when. I asked him about it he would just say they were playing football at lunch but. I knew he was absolutely not the type to play football his school was next to mine and at lunch. I went over to see what was really going on as expected he wasn't anywhere to be seen by the kids playing football but after a few minutes. I did find him reading in one of the corners then as. I was leaving. I saw my ex-girlfriend and her best friend go up to him they started making fun of him and even snatched his book out of his hands ripping it in half then she even went as far as to kick him a few times. I immediately put a stop to it and told her to get lost we went home that day and told our parents but before they went to the principal about it. I thought of something the next day. I took him to the ice cream shop where she worked and told him to go get some he's deathly allergic to gluten and dairy so after he asked for it to be specially made. I knew she would try something. I stood in a corner where. I could see her making it and managed to get a video on my phone of her mixing in milk and. Wafers to the bottom this would have killed him. I showed the manager and she now has a criminal record and will never work with food again in her life.

What was your proudest moment when. I was 28 I jumped in front of a car that was about to hit my 6-year-old daughter. I pushed her out of the way but in the process. I was put into a coma on impact. I woke up a day later and soon realized. I could no longer walk and was paralyzed from the waist down. I tried to be strong but every day was a painful reminder of what. I'd lost. I could no longer chase her around the park carry her on my shoulders but what. I missed most was dancing with her in the living room she'd come home every day from her lessons and show me all the moves she learned for the last 20 years. I've been in a wheelchair and a few months go. I was offered an experimental spinal surgery last month. I started to feel the faintest tingle in my legs it was hope. I've been working with. Physicians and can finally stand up by myself today. I facetimed my daughter to surprise her and when. I stood up on camera her face was one of pure shock and happiness and when. I told her that soon. I'd be able to take her for walks around the park like we used to she started to tear up. I don't like seeing my daughter cry so. I got an idea. I tried recreating one of her favorite dance moves we used to do in our living room to get her to stop it didn't work she started crying more.

How did you get back at an entitled customer. I used to work at. Disneyland as goofy. I loved my job and never felt like. I worked a day in my life because it was so much fun we all had very adamant rules about breaking character no matter how hot it got in those costumes we had to keep going. I never told anybody outside my close friends. I was the one in the suit but was just friends with. Goofy however there was only one time. I broke character. I was finishing my shift when. I heard a woman yelling at me. I turned around and heard her calling me a racist she said you ignored my kids because they're black. I'm getting you fired in reality. I just didn't see them but for good measure. I went back out and said hi took a picture then headed back to undress after my break. I went back out and was quickly approached by my manager alongside the same woman she told him. I ignored her kids and once again called me a racist after he assured her. I would never do such a thing she kept going she was yelling at both of us now calling us racist pieces of. I could tell my manager thought it was funny and then he gave me a nod. I knew exactly what he meant and. I made sure nobody was looking at me then. I secretly pulled up my sleeve to show her my own black skin the look on her face was absolutely priceless.

I disown my son. I have a son and he has a girlfriend. I wasn't super close with her as we didn't have a lot in common but. I liked her as a person and welcomed her into the family they had been together for just over a year over the past six-ish months. I had noticed a change in her behavior her and my son usually come over at least every two weeks for a family dinner. I knew they were having some money problems and financial stress so. I chalked it up to that they came over last. Christmas for dinner along with about seven other close family members all vaccinated and negative tests for covet she was quiet the whole dinner afterwards. I was catching up on some dishes and cleaning up prepping desserts and she joined me in the kitchen and asked if. I needed help. I gladly let her come in to help me with the pies she seemed skittish so. I asked her if she was okay she looked at me like a deer in headlights and then started crying. I thought it was about money when finances are tight the holidays can be hard. I pulled her in for a hug and told her if they needed help they just had to ask and asked her if there was anything. I could do after a few minutes of sobbing she was able to stop and she just blurted it all out my son was abusing her she showed me the bruises on her arm from him grabbing her told me how she couldn't talk to her family without him present told me about how he controlled all of her money and had her move.

Wife told her husband that if he ever comes home drunk she will leave him nonetheless he goes out he drinks a lot and throws up all over himself he turns to his friend and asks what should. I do his friend is helpful go home he says tell your wife someone threw up on you and put a 20 lb note inside your jacket pocket show her the money and tell her the other man gave it to you for the dry cleaning bill so this he does his wife is at first angry but he explains he tells her about the drunk man who threw up on him he shows her the 20 lb she look. BS but why have you got two 20 lb notes she asks oh he says the other one is from the man who shatten my pants.

Man married a woman who had previously divorced 10 husbands on their wedding night she told her new husband please be gentle. I'm still a virgin what said the groom shocked how can that be if you've been married 10 times well first husband was a sales representative he kept telling me how great it was going to be second husband was in software. Services he was never really sure how it was supposed to function but he said he'd look into it and get back to me third husband was from. Field. Services he said everything checked out diagnostically but he just couldn't get the system up fourth was in telemarketing even though he knew he had the order he didn't know when he would be able to deliver fifth was an engineer he the basic process but wanted 3 years to research. Implement and design the method sixth was from finance and administration he thought he knew how but he wasn't sure whether it was his job or not seventh was in marketing although he had a nice product he was never sure how to position it eight was a psychologist all he ever did was talk about it ninth was a gynecologist all he did was look at it 10th was a stamp collector all he ever did was uh. I miss him but now that. I've married you. I'm really excited good said the new husband but why you're a lawyer this time. I know. I'm going to get really screwed.

My daughter has been dating her boyfriend for 2 years now before meeting him my daughter strictly told me not to mention his dad or any family members to him as he is not close with him. I didn't ask what happened and. I respected what she had told me genuinely. I liked him a lot he is a good guy responsible truly loves my daughter we got along. I only met him a handful of times a few days ago my daughter came to visit me along with him. I was fixing my car he looked curious and asked what. I was doing. I told him. I was doing basic maintenance to it like changing the oil and checking tire pressure that sort of things we went into talking and he told me he doesn't know even the basics when it comes to taking care of a car let alone fixing it he always just paid a mechanic to do it. I was shocked. I told him. I could teach him a couple of things if he really wanted to know he doesn't need to was his money on fixing bassic things he was a fast learner he had pick it up what. I was telling him to do after he was done. I patted his back and said well down my son the expression on his face changed one second he was happy and the next his mood was completely different he broke down crying on the floor.

I threw my parents favorite line back in their faces during an argument and it humiliated them. I'm currently 27 years old growing up. I had always been the kid who my parents didn't give a crap about as the middle child it was always oh your sibling needs us more and my needs were quite often just not met any attempt to get my parents to do something with her for me was met with being called. Selfish and told my siblings needs came before mine right now neither of my siblings have special needs they are just both kind of spoiled brats my brothers 30 and 25 are the golden oldest child in their precious baby. I was. The. Unwanted girl child in the middle they made this clear in all sorts of ways from not wanting to pay for my school supplies and wanting me to figure it out to the way birthdays were treated to. Christmas forget them showing up do anything for me but. I was expected to drop everything to show up to any and everything my brothers did my brothers both got brand new cars for their 16th birthdays but. I didn't need one. I got a rusty bike they found in the garage sale and told if. I could fix it up they guessed. I could have it. I fixed it up and they gave it to my brother instead.

When did you realize your child was no longer a child when my son was in the eighth grade he got suspended and. I had to leave work early to go get him when. I got there. I asked the principal what had happened the principal explained that my son had beaten up three other boys and even broke one boy's arm. I was obviously horrified and asked my son what on. Earth he was thinking he simply told me that the boys had cornered one of his friends and were trying to make her strip for them being the chivalrous boy. I raised him to be he put a stop to it. I asked the principal if it was true and he dodged the question in response to that. I told the school that if they're going to allow sexual harassment. I didn't want my child to attend and took him home. I told my son that. I was going to take him out of public schools he replied by telling me that he didn't want to leave the school because if he wasn't there then who was going to stop it from happening again this is when. I realized my little boy had become a man he would rather get in trouble to protect a friend than stay out of the spotlight and potentially face long-term consequences.

What has your child done that is technically wrong but you were proud of them for doing it. I got a call from my son's principal in grade six when. I arrived at the office the principal summoned my son and proceed to inform me that my son had pushed another kid the principal told me the details were unimportant as the school had a zero tolerance policy when it came to violence the principal again objected so. I finally asked my son for his side of the story it turns out the child my son had pushed was beating up a classmate who was confined to a wheelchair my son pushed the bully to stop him from hurting the kid in a wheelchair. I asked the principal if this was true and he corroborated my son's story. I was stunned the principal then informed me that my son will have to serve a one-day suspension. I thought for a few seconds and looked at my son and said tomorrow you and. I are going to get up early and we are going for breakfast then you can spend the rest of the day playing video games the principal looked shocked at my response and said. I am trying to teach your son a lesson here and you are undermining my authority. I looked at the principal and explained it was him who was sending the wrong message and that my son's only alternative to allowing the bully to beat up a wheelchair bound child was to push him away.

What is something your parents did that backfired to them horribly when my mom remarried my stepdad and his five kids moved into our home my mom stayed in the house after divorcing my dad the only reason why my dad gave up and left the house is because for me and my little brothers to live comfortably my mom's second marriage changed her a lot and loved them more well after 2 months of living with us my older stepsisters wanted and demanded our rooms because it is relatively larger than theirs and they are sharing a room they wanted privacy and a better view. I came home my stepdad moved my things in the hallway and said my new room is the basement basement is cold and is currently our storage. I didn't last for a month and told my dad about it my dad came after my mom and stepdad my little brothers and. I planned to move in with our dad shortly after that because my mom went full me for telling my dad turns out the house is still under my dad's name and just left when they finalized the divorce and my mom doesn't have any legal ties to it safe to say my dad took over and kicked her new family out. I was 13 at that time so my dad filed a custody order and we won.

What is not a bullet you dodged but a huge tactical nuke you dodged. I proposed to my ex-girlfriend in college after finding out she was pregnant she claimed it was mine went to my parents house and told them about it my parents talked about it and forced me to marry her only because my parents were traditional and it is a sin to not take responsibility for a child not long after she told my parents about her pregnancy. I proposed to her on her birthday. I was still in complete shock and felt. I was on autopilot and just followed my parents we compromised to get married after college but she demanded my parents to do it sooner because she lied about having a high-risk pregnanc and she can't handle any stress well on her third trimester. I texted her best friend about a surprise baby shower. I wanted to prepare for her. I met her for lunch and told me that. I was a nice guy for doing these and guilt was killing her so she told me that she slept with a bunch of guys got pregnant and didn't know who the father was since. I was dumb enough to believe her she picked me to take responsibility. I called off the engagement and requested a paternity test results came back and the best friend was right her friend saved my life.

What is something a parent did that backfired to them horribly when my boyfriend got me pregnant in my early 20s there was so much pressure and lack of support coming from his family my boyfriend came from a good family who has money and are successful my boyfriend was always there during my checkups and took care of me anyway his parents was against it because they strongly think my baby wasn't their sons and the mom told me. I was after their money or. I was lying so. I can have a better life my boyfriend defended me many times and rejected his dad's offer to do a paternity test when my son was born my boyfriend's parents visited me alone and they demanded a. DNA test since my boyfriend was against it all of a sudden the mom of my boyfriend started begging him to stop it and told him that this is a bad idea and they should just accept the baby. I confidently told them that we can do it using both of their. DNA samples after a few days the results came back and my son successfully tested and is related with my boyfriend's mom but not with the dad it was a full-blown family drama after finding out that my boyfriend wasn't his son the dad accepted me and my son into the family unfortunately just 3 months after the. DNA test the dad divorced the mom for cheating on him 26 years ago.

What is your biggest. Uno reverse my husband divorced me because we found out during my checkup and screening tests that our baby won't be normal and that he will have. Down syndrome. I can remember the horror in my husband's face when we went back home he told me that we should get rid of it and try again and. I told him that. I will never do that and it is our baby he threatened me with divorce if. I don't do it. I stood my ground and said. I'd rather have a divorce rather than have my son to have a father like him we went through divorce during my first trimester it was very difficult but my family was there to support way before. I gave birth he already got a new girl and he got her pregnant he sent me a text saying that their baby is healthy unlike mine and told me how unlucky. I was. I just blocked him and thought that no matter what. I will love my baby and will protect him from anything fast forward to giving birth my son came out and he was 100% normal my delivery doctor told me that it is common to get misdiagnosed. I cried so hard because my faith was tested after a few months the sister of my ex visited me and told me that my ex's new baby was unfortunately diagnosed at. Birth of trom 21 Down syndrome my ex was. Furious and left the delivery room and he never claimed the baby as his.

What was the scariest we need to leave now gut feeling that you've ever experienced. I recently gave birth to twin girls. I had kept this a secret from my family to surprise them a month before. I gave birth my sister's child tragically passed away from. SIDS and my family mourned the loss of the baby when. I gave birth my whole family visited me except for my sister and her husband. I understood because they were still grieving news quickly spread that. I had given birth to twins my sister visited with her in-laws her mother-in-law immediately said that. God had sent another baby for my sister claiming one of my twins was a. Reincarnation of their. Lost. Child. I firmly told them that both babies were mine they held my twins and looked at each other convinced that one of them was indeed their lost baby my husband quickly took our babies and kicked them out later that day my mother visited and insisted. I should give one of my twins to my sister because she was mourning. I refused told her they are mine the next morning we saw on our ring camera her mother-in-law was standing in front of our door at 3:00 a.m. praying it sent chills down my spine. I threatened them to leave us alone every day for one week a dead bird that was gutted is on our porch and a red colored stained the sides of our home my husband and. I knew right then we have to leave.

What's the biggest bullet you've ever dodged. I held a gender reveal for my first child and since. I'm a boxing coach we decided to make it a bit more exciting. I dressed up as a boxer in blue and my best friend dressed in pink we had an actual ring set up in the yard the plan was simple whoever won the fight would reveal the baby's gender at the last minute just before. I changed into my costume my wife's brother begged to take my place he wanted to be part of the fun so. I let him replace me no one knew it was him behind the costume the match went on for 5 minutes then my best friend accidentally hit my brother-in-law in the back of the head with great force knocking him out he later removed the mask and was shocked to see it was my brother-in-law it turned out to be a girl and everyone cheered but then he stood up and collapsed a few minutes later he was rushed to the emergency room and diagnosed with brain damage requiring surgery he ended up in a coma for almost a year when he woke up he was in a vegetative state after he went into a coma my wife was. Furious and the truth came out it turned out that my wife and best friend had planned this it was supposed to be me in the coma. I also found out the child wasn't mine but my best friends their plan backfired horribly and that poor brother ended up paying the price.

Today. I F. Fed. Up learning sign language my mom has been dating someone for a few months to be fair enough time has passed for me to stop referring to him as the new guy but he's not my dad and. I guess that will always make him feel like the new guy according to movie logic. I'm supposed to hate him for trying to replace my father or whatever but the truth is. I like him in fact. I've been picking up sign language to communicate better with him as he is deaf he lip reads which has been our main mode of communication my mom learned sign language quickly at the start of their relationship now capable of full conversations without speaking. I admire her for that and the new guy does too. I'm not as proficient yet but. I can follow simple conversations. I plan to surprise him on his birthday 2 months away by wishing him what and welcoming him to the family in. Sign. Language however. I never factored in the amount of dirty talk my mom and new guy were having in. Sign. Language not knowing that. I can understand them my mom and new guy have gotten disturbingly comfortable exposing their intimate life in my company it didn't matter if we were at the dinner table or watching. TV. I would constantly catch so many dirty descriptions being communicated between the two of them they are worse than horny teenagers and. I should know. I am one no 17-year-old son should ever witness his mother use her fingers to demonstrate how wet her part is it's gotten to the point where. I'm no longer willing to wait until. New guys's birthday to make it known that. I can understand sign language because holy [__] I need my eyes to not see this [__] anymore this is an ongoing [__] up.

What family secret was finally spilled in your family my grandma didn't drive. I thought she couldn't but it was just never discussed one day when. I was maybe. Seven 8 years old. I'd been trying to get someone anyone to drive me to the store for candy we were visiting my aunt and uncle grandma lived with them they had bid honey at the local store which. I could no longer get at home but no one would take me to the store finally. I said. I'd just ask. Grandma and my cousin chimed in with grandma can't drive oh you bet your sweet ass. I can drive they just don't let me. Grandma had overheard and she was in high dudgeon but that's all that was said about it and my aunt finally took me to the store so. I forgot about it years later when. I just gotten my license. I asked my mom what was up with. Grandma not driving she explained that during prohibition. Grandma bootlegged alcohol for moonshiners she was very successful at it she was so successful that when the. Moonshiners were finally busted even though the revenuers never caught my grandma her license was suspended by the state to never be reissued later in life she was told she could petition for it back but it came with an admission of guilt or some such she told them to go to hell.

People who quit their jobs on the first day what was your. I'm out of here moment. I got a job at a bill to. Bear knockoff at the end of a mall that wasn't very busy my interview with the owners was interesting they were an older couple who said that they had wanted to open a. Chick-fil-A but you need about a million dollars to do that my first day one other girl was working and she didn't really talk to me. I had basically no training and she disappeared into the back. I was standing at the register area which was underneath a giant storybook mushroom a mother and her young son walked in and started to look at the bare skin options. I greeted them and left them to look around they ended up leaving after a couple of minutes and my coworker reappeared from the back with the cordless phone and handed it to me it was my boss he told me that when a customer walks in he wants me to come out from under the mushroom to them come out from the mushroom after he finished speaking to me. I hung up and went to my coworker and asked about the phone call she said the place has camera set up and the owners watch them from their house and call in a lot. I did not come back to work after that day.

I just realized. I'm jealous of my 6-year-old. I woke up this morning and found my 6-year-old on the sofa fully dressed and ready for school an hour before he was supposed to be up. I asked hey buddy what are you doing up so early he replied. I accidentally peed the bed this morning around like 4: and. I tried to wake you up but couldn't so. I took my blankets off put them by the laundry room and changed then. I came out here. I thanked him for taking care of it and told him not to worry we'll have everything cleaned and ready for his bed later next time uh make sure you pee before bed accidents happen blah blah blah. Etc and then he got up and prepared breakfast. I made coffee and as. I sat there a thought crossed my mind. I'm jealous of this kid this moment took me back to when. I was about his age recalling how. I used to wet the bed but my first instinct wasn't to wake my parents hell no they would have beaten the crap out of me. I instead went to the bathroom stole a roll of toilet paper and tried to dry my. PE drenched linen because. I knew if my parents found out. I would be in a lot of trouble and. I was terrified of them my son doesn't have to live with that kind of fear instead he tried to get me and when. I didn't wake up he took care of it himself and. I wish. I felt that sense of safety and reassurance when. I was his age.

What was the most legendary thing a student did at school my buddy was once really annoyed with us guys the five of us he followed us into the bathroom intent on acting the tough guy convinced that one of us was concealed in a stall he says peekaboo. I see you and kicks the stall door in on a teacher we all knew taking a crap the teacher said. I see you too. Nathan now close the door. I will die the day. I forget about that. LEL.

My girlfriend kicks me off my. Spotify account every morning. I couldn't be happier my girlfriend. F22 and. I M23 live together my day starts much earlier than hers. I'm usually at the office by 6:30 a.m. which is about when she starts waking up. I'm typically one of the first to arrive at the office so. I start my day by putting on headphones and listening to music however. I only get about 15 minutes of. Music before it stops and. I receive a notification that the output device has changed this happens because we have a. Google home device at home that's linked to my. Spotify account when my girlfriend wakes up she starts her day with hey. Google play so she has music while getting ready. I always leave my phone open to see what she's listening to and when she heads out around 7:30 I get my account back. I'm sure she has no idea that she's participating in this little routine and. I have no intentions of telling her sure it' be easy to switch it to her account but. I love knowing that she's awake and starting her day listening to her favorite songs another benefit of this setup is that. I know what her current favorite songs are so when we get in the car together or we're just sitting around. I know which songs will spark. Joy some days. I think she's on to me we're both very happy together and. I plan on proposing in a few weeks.

What was the best revenge you've ever gotten my friend. Mike had a serious crush on a beautiful popular girl who always claimed to be busy whenever he asked her out yet she never discouraged. I think she liked the attention one day. Mike scored two tickets to a soldout. You2 concert and quickly invited his dream girl who eagerly accepted he was thrilled the night of the concert they were at the arena waiting for the show to begin when she suddenly said oh. I see my friend. I'll be right back she never came back. Mike waited at their seats and even after the show to drive her home but she vanished without answering his calls or texts he left feeling deeply hurt by the next morning he was rightfully pissed she called him around noon apologizing and saying she ran into her ex they had a long talk worked out a lot of stuff and lost track of time she had actually missed the concert and blah blah blah he accepted her apology and asked if they could try again she accepted and told him how very nice and forgiving he was she had underestimated him so the next. Saturday evening he took her to a very expensive seafood restaurant about an hour up the coast he was polite and chatty the whole way there he made the reservation in her name they were seated ordered a nice bottle of wine some expensive appetizers and. Entre then. Mike excused himself to go to the men's room he very deliberately said. I'll be right back he walked out to the parking lot and drove away.

I used to be a princess for kids birthday parties. I once showed up to a party as. Sleeping. Beauty only to be greeted by a large group of guys celebrating a 30th birthday there was a lot of confusion the guy who booked it was like but. I ordered. Aurora for an hour and a half half of the guys started cracking up bro. Aurora is. Sleeping. Beauty you got a princess instead of a stripper no one could figure out how this happened. I ended up painting faces and making balloon animals until they were able to procure some actual strippers who were all really nice and found the whole thing hilarious and got tipped very well all in all not a bad party and those guys have some hilarious pictures of a fully costumed. Sleeping. Beauty standing beside three half-clothed strippers.

When. I was 15 I tried to bake a carrot cake and. I think. I misread how much carrots to put and ended up with maybe 10 x the amount of carrots you're supposed to use whatever. I did it became the mushiest cake ever guests were already coming and in a stroke of. Genius. I told my mom's friends since two of you are bringing your babies along. I made it extra soft for them. I also reduced the sugar and increased the carrots to make it healthier my parents friends kept going on about what a thoughtful sweet kid. I am baking a cake especially with babies in mind the weird thing was the babies were hooked on the cake one of the moms kept calling my mom for the next few months asking if. I had time to bake that cake again. I did try to replicate it but. I just couldn't so. I kept pretending. I was too busy. I met her kid again when she was 11 and apparently one of her earliest memories was eating that cake her mom told her. I was the one who baked it for her so she was really excited to meet me because in her memories it's some mind-blowingly awesome cake that no cake has ever compared to. I had to burst her bubble and tell her what really happened.

People who work for the super wealthy what stuff have you seen. I did a. Manny male nanny job for a rich couple who wanted someone to care for their kids the wife didn't want a female. Nanny and. I was in college so it helped pay the bills one day they asked do you want to go to. Hawaii turns out the company that the husband was the. COO of was doing an executive retreat in. Hawaii instead of finding daycare in. Hawaii for their kids they thought it'd be easier to just pay for me to fly to. Hawaii care for the kids during the day and then have my evenings or their family time free so. I went to. Hawaii on their dime had my own hotel room they paid me for my time and gave me a large stip in for my own food entertainment. I ended up with pretty much every evening off so. I got to spend it during the day. I brought their kids to the beach we went hiking and did some touristy running around on top of that they gave me $5,000 in spending money in case any of the kids wanted anything. I had to show receipts but when. I tried to turn in the receipts the wife just said oh don't worry about it it's only a couple. Grand and never verified how. I'd spent some of that money. I couldn't tell if she just trusted me implicitly by that point or if she truly thought the amount was so small it didn't matter.

People who work for the super wealthy what stuff have you seen the. CEO of the company. I worked for was the. Founder's son his dad made him start with the most basic jobs in the company and work his way through the different departments staff was ordered not to treat him any differently than a new hire so when he became. CEO he wasn't a bad guy to work for one night. I'm working the late shift and he calls hey you guys got electrician he is clearly drunk he wants someone to take a ride to his house and figure out why the. Internet isn't working. I volunteered. I get to the house the entry gate is smashed a section of the white horse fencing is gone. Jaguar is stuck in the field here in the house is dude completely blast he's got a huge cut on his hairline are you okay boss. I'm fine why he asks blood literally caked on his face. I accompany him to the bathroom and help him clean himself up then. I corrected the internet unplug plug as. I'm walking out he asks me to do a shot with him. I comment that it might be a bad idea he agrees and hands me the bottle take it home and do a shot later when. I get back to work. I look the stuff up it's a $1,500 bottle of. Scotch the next day he comes walking up uh we not going to be talking about last night. I tell him it's all good a little bit later. I get an envelope there's a check attached for emergency tech support $5,000

Lawyers of. Reddit what was your oh moment in court sat in on a personal injury case where the plaintiff broke their leg in an accident and had a doctor on the stand as an expert the woman's lawyer begins questioning the doctor about their experience with leg injuries the doctor was a well-known orthopedic surgeon in the area she asks if he's ever treated a tibula fracture the leg bones are tibia and fibula to which he only answers no then she starts grilling him with questions about the tibula after about six to seven questions she asks how did did you get a medical license and have been able to practice medicine this long if you've never treated a tibula fracture she begins a small rant about going after his credentials and those that gave it to him to which he simply responds there is no bone named the tibula the lawyer became beat red and everyone in the room tried their best to keep from laughing including the judge.

Doctors of. Reddit what's the biggest case of. Faking it you've ever seen had a prisoner come in after a fight and claimed he couldn't move or feel his legs all the. CT scans and. MRIs were normal but we would. Shield his legs so he couldn't see them and poke them with needles and other sharp objects with enough. Force to cause pain he never flinched or moved his legs at all he was diagnosed with. Sora spinal cord injury without radiographic abnormality he stayed in the hospital for a week no improvement always had one guard with him one night they were down in the lobby watching some television but the guard needed to use the restroom the patient said where could. I possibly go. I'm paralyzed guard left him alone for 2 minutes patient last scen sprinting down the road naked butt cheeks flapping in the breeze made it to a city 4 hours away by car before he was caught again. I have never seen anyone fake it so well.

When did you not just dodge a bullet but evade a full-on ballistic missile strike. I was traveling in. Australia and stayed with this dude for a week or two at first he was the coolest guy but then. I quickly realized he was a terrible alcoholic and a drug dealer that had recently been in prison one night while. I was out he apparently got completely hammered and was causing a scene at the apartment complex so the police were called. I show up and see cop cars everywhere. I had enough and just booked a flight for the next morning to see another city. I woke up in the morning and quickly threw my clothes into my bag and was about to leave without even saying goodbye but. I thought that was pretty rude so. I grabbed a pen and started writing a little thank you note to the guy for letting me stay while writing the note he wakes up and comes into the common room. I do the whole oh shoot sorry. I didn't want to wake you but. I found a cheap flight leaving right now he responds can. I see your bag really quick before you leave. I think. I left something in there the dude freaking took his stash of meth and put it into my bag when the police showed up the night before. I just didn't notice it in my rush to get packed and leave. I was literally about to go board an airplane and. I would have sat there like a with the exact same excuse everyone else uses saying it's not mine.

Police officers of. Reddit who's the smartest criminal you've ever encountered. I knew this guy who really wanted this high-powered. Superbike but he knew he couldn't never afford it so what he did was to take a drive to. London to scout for a few days until he found that particular model parked outside a house he goes back that night with a slide hammer pulls the lock and steals the bike he gets it home puts it in his garage and completely strips it so that the only thing left is the frame and the bottom half of the engine which he drags into the weeds at the bottom of his garden then he pours fuel over it and burns it a bit a few weeks pass and weeds have started growing over it it's at that point he calls the cops and reports that someone had dumped a bike frame in his garden the cops show up and he explains that he just got back from being away and found it the cops take the frame and note down his name and address a few days later the cops call him and say that the bike had been stolen from. London a month or so ago and that the insurance company had classed the bike as a write- off and had told the cops to dispose of it but because the frame was found in his garden and the insurance company didn't want it the cops were. Duty bound to ask him if he wanted to keep it.

What event in your life still. Fricks with you to this day when. I was a child. I received an invitation to a birthday party it was handwritten and given to me by the kid whose birthday it was when. I got there he pretended not to remember inviting me and asked to see the invitation he denied writing it in front of many of my classmates and said. I invited myself. I was so upset that. I wanted to leave immediately but my mom had already left so. I explained what happened to his mom so she could maybe drop me off luckily his mom recognized his handwriting and was clearly angry at her son for being a bully so she gave some lamingtons and a soda and told me. I could go play video games by myself until my mom picked me up that was the day. I discovered that none of my classmates were my friends.

Police officers who have arrested other police officers what happened ex sheriff's deputy here one night on shift. I overheard on the radio that a small local chief of police was not answering a radio call so. I made my way to try and locate this chief of police on my way to the police station thinking maybe he's just asleep on the couch. I see his squad car pulled off onto the side of the road lights going at that moment my heart sank my first thought was oh no this dude just got killed on a traffic stop as. I'm walking up to the car in a hurry. I noticed that he was slumped over. I reached into the open driver's window and grabbed his shoulder to try and put my fingers against his neck to feel if he has pulse or if his skin is still warm and generally check to see if he is in fact still alive as. I'm doing this. I notice a distinct and strong odor of alcohol then the chief of police woke up looks at me puts the car in drive and pulls away about that time another deputy pulled up behind my car and. I put out my radio that the chief was driving off the other. Deputy forgetting that we all use a shared frequency then comes over the radio and says hey he should be easy to follow his lights are on the lights go off fast forward to several hours later this chief of police shows up with the mayor of the small town and submits himself to a breathalyzer he barely pass what.

Police officers what criminal could have gotten away with it if they had kept their mouth shut. I was asked to help keep peace while two probation officers searched a guy house before everyone gets upset in most jurisdictions you have to submit to a search of your person and your home if you're on probation during the search a police officer lifted the probationer's mattress and said monotonously wow the probationer got upset and said yeah it's freaking math and a pew pew arrest me. I don't give a. Frick turns out the. Poo found a huge dodo but after the guy opened his mouth the. Poo lifted the mattress more and found a bunch of individually wrapped grams of math and a. Glock 17 the. Poo said that seeing the dodo was enough for him to ignore the mattress but because the guy said something he kept looking that's guy's attitude and his need to open his mouth got him 10 years in prison.

What is your never interrupt an enemy while they are making a mistake moment. I was doing a mortgage for a french guy in. Miami. Beach that had a. French realtor even though both were completely fluent in. English she frequently did aides in. French having no idea. I spoke. French when they settled on a property and we were riding the elevator down from the condo she told him that look these guys are scumbags and they're going to screw you over and. I have a much better person that you can work with even though the way foreign investment works is identical throughout the state towards the end of the ride. I say to the guy in fluent. French that we would be happy to compare our proposal with whatever her people could come up with and it's his choice but certainly we would like to work with him on this and any future. Investments he starts laughing his ass off and she was completely mortified he went with us and fired her as his agent on the spot.

When did you realize you married the wrong person we were in the bathroom getting showered and dressed for a friend's wedding. I was in the best shape of my life at the time feeling good about myself and. I thought. I looked good in that suit she was finishing her makeup and. I remarked at how beautiful she looked. I waited for her to say something nice in reply but she didn't and it just hit me. I couldn't remember a single time that she complimented me on my appearance so. I said that to her. I said you know. I always tell you how beautiful you are and how attracted to you. I am but. I never recall you ever saying that. I look good or that. I look handsome she stopped applying her mascara long enough to dismissively roll her eyes at me so. I made the mistake of asking her do you even find me attractive and she flatly said no. I asked why did you marry me then and she said. I didn't think it was important at the time. I never felt so ugly and unloved and it hurt even more when. I had been feeling so good about myself for once in my life 30 seconds earlier.

Poor people who have dated rich people what did you learn my ex-wife had a grandfather that was a multi-millionaire. Christmas time at their house was like being in another world all of the different family members would try to get a moment with the. King and kissed ass as much as possible. I spent my time down on the ground playing with my kids and was happy to get out of there about a week or two after the second. Christmas. I got a phone call from. Grandpa he wanted to know what he could do for my family. I told him. I didn't want any of his money but. I would like my kids to know their great-grandfather father later that year he showed up at our place unexpected and spent most of the afternoon telling stories with me about his youth he set up a trust fund for each one of my kids to have their college paid for a little bit after that he told me out of all of his in-laws. I was the only one that never asked him for anything but to be himself.

Dads what was your don't tell. Mom about this moment when. I was 12 or so. I walked into my dad's office to find him counting money he says don't tell. Mom and you'll find out what it's for so. I don't say a thing 2 days later he woke me up early to run errands with him we came back with a new used but new for us car he also said if. I don't tell how much he spent on it he'll let me drive it it was only a couple hundred but we were broke and she would have been mad my mother tried so hard to find out but. I kept the secret so anytime we were in an open space like an empty lot he would let me drive it. I felt like the coolest kid in middle school knowing how to drive a car again don't tell your mother says when. I got my permit at 16 I was so excited to drive it for real. I asked my mother if. I can drive her around when she has to go out but she says absolutely not since. I have no experience well. I can't argue because. I don't want to get. Dad in trouble this goes on for a few weeks. I keep asking she keeps telling me no this finally happened one day while dad was home and overheard he comes in the room gives me a nod and says to my mothers he's a better driver than you anyway tosses me the keys and tells. Mom everything. I was so stoked and cheering. I can drive. I can drive dad says drive it if you can keep a secret for that long you can keep the car too.

What made the high school legend become a legend we had a teacher who was. Infamous for not letting you go to the bathroom no matter what. I mean so much so that if you accidentally started your period in class she'd make you wait this happened so there was a girl who will call. Katie in class who tended to be a bit of a troublemaker. Katie hated that teacher because she'd begged to go to the bathroom and got shut down every time at the end of the year. Katie asked one more time to go to the bathroom the teacher said no. Katie asked another time 5 minutes later the teacher said no again 5 minutes after that. Katie asked again but said that the teacher was not going to like what happened if the teacher didn't let her go the teacher hit the roof and said that if she said one more thing. Katie would be sent to the principal. Katie. Shrugged and said this is on you then and pissed on her seat right where she was the teacher sent her to the principal who called her parents one of which was a urologist her father yelled at the principal the teacher ended up in deep according to other kids she never denied another kid the bathroom again. Katie was a freaking. Legend.

What's the worst. I hate to break it to you moment you had with someone there was a rule at my job where only one of these two supervisors could be off at a time one of them loved to take a full week off work during holidays to get more bang for his. PTO buck one year he had. Thanksgiving week off but the other supervisor had family come to town that week on late notice the other supervisor asked him to cancel just one of his days so she could spend the day with family he declined even after she basically begged him and he even said he didn't have anything to do that day she then proceeded to take. PTO days every. Wednesday of a holiday week for the next calendar year effectively blocking him from taking his cheap weeks off he told me that he thought it was funny because he knew she didn't have enough time to take all those vacation days off and she'd eventually have to cancel some of them. I got to tell him. I hate to break it to you but she only took 2 hours off each of those days see the rule didn't differentiate between a partial or whole day so she only had to burn 24 or so hours to block him he looked devastated it was kind of petty on both of their parts but. I give her credit for being creative in her retribution and don't blame her a bit for what she did.

Police officers what was your they could have gotten away with it if they had kept their mouth shut moment. I had a car pass me once passenger hangs the upper half of his body out of the passenger side window with his middle finger in the air while screaming. Frick the police he had my attention for the seat belt violation. I got behind the car and ran the registration registration is suspended the registered owner's driver's license is attached to the registration and his license is suspended registered owner also has two warrants for retail theft. I stopped the car and they both started with the free speech thing and how. I can't stop them for giving me the finger or swearing which is 100% correct but then. I pointed out that. I can however stop them for the passenger not wearing a seat belt and for the registration violation suddenly they got quiet driver got arrested for suspended license and his warrants and the passenger got himself a citation the driver's vehicle got impounded moral of the story tell your passengers to shut their mouths had that guy not been a his buddy would have been. Homeward. Bound.

When have you seen the real world hit a spoiled brat when my brother was in school he was horrifically bullied for being autistic and his bully was the most entitled little. I've ever had the displeasure of meeting his father paid for boxing practice karate lessons and other martial arts this made him think that he was the best at anything physical my brother isn't overly fond of sports and prefers to read in the library as the typical nerdy kid he's a prime target for bullies one day when the bully had cornered my brother up against a wall my brother finally decided that he wasn't just going to take it anymore but he strongly dislikes violence and thus would not be fighting back instead when the bully tried to punch him my brother ducked three broken fingers and a trip to the hospital later the bully's father finds out what had been happening all his extra classes training were canceled he had all of his electronics and games sold and if he wanted to have a car he would have to work for every penny himself.

When have you seen the real world hit a spoiled brat. I was a school bus driver in the' 70s there were lots of entitled brats but one stands out he was a super entitled kid constantly defying rules eventually. I caught him with too many witnesses attempting to set a bus seat on fire with his lighter school officials were called there was a hearing with school officials and his. Rich. Dad he got banned from. All. Buses for the rest of semester dad offers to pay for the damage and quietly accepts the punishment then comes the surprise the next morning when. I arrive at 6:00 a.m. to clean my bus a regular task every morning the rich kid and his dad are standing there the dad introduces me to my new personal bus cleaner for the rest of the year he then brings the kid every morning and forces him to wash and clean the floors on my bus before taking him on to school by the end of year the entitled kid is actually working hard and being friendly we're getting along pretty well and. I help him out sometimes so he can get on to school the kid turns out okay when all is over good move by his dad.

Police officers what criminal actually impressed you with their criminal skills this guy in high school. Luis was a known drug dealer he didn't make it a secret everyone bought weed and harder stuff off of him the cops constantly pulled him over to search him and whenever a drug rated thing happened at school he was often the first kid they searched but they would never catch him with any drugs they regularly cut locks off his gym locker and his regular. Locker in hopes of finding his stash but they never found it one time there was a rumor going around that his stash was stored in a locker not assigned to anyone which prompted the administration to search every single. Locker in the school the administration had no idea what to do they would catch kids with weed and the kids would flat out say. I bought this from. Lis. Lu would encourage them to say it they would then search luis's stuff inside out cops would search his car and he consented to all of it and laughed when they found nothing eventually the vice principal's younger son asked for shoes for. Christmas that had a secret compartment in them light bulbs go off in his head the first day back after holiday break he pulls. Luis out of class they bring him into the office and then the. VP tells him to take his shoes off turns out his hunch was right he had hidden compartments in his shoes but there were no drugs in there. I guess luish is laughing his ass off at this point luish has the audacity to explain that he hasn't seen any of his classmates for 3 weeks he had not taken any orders yet had the. VP waited a day he would have caught him.

What was the incident at your high school in an effort to crack down on grinding at school dances the principal did a schoolwide. PSA about it apparently a common excuse students gave to avoid getting in trouble for it was that while they may have heard that grinding was against the rules they didn't know what grinding meant so he described it in detail then at the end of the. PSA he said that any student who still did not understand could come down to his office where he would use dolls to demonstrate the prohibited. Behavior hundreds of students lined up outside his office the hallway was utterly impassible for the rest of the day and students refused to be shepherded to class by staff because the principal said he would show us how to grind teach joined the line his idea to fix this was to announce instead we could attend an optional. Auditorium demonstration after school that day the auditorium had never been more full after school groups postponed activities even the teachers in charge of them just sort of got out of the way and let it happen kids called texted their parents and told them they had to attend and would need to be picked up later buses were delayed screwing up the busing schedule it was a train wreck he did the demo he got fired almost immediately we later found out that he was very unpopular among the staff at that school and a lot of teachers sort of went out of their way to help the train wreck pile up as badly as possible he really has no one to blame but himself though.

Officers what criminal actually impressed you with their criminal skills there were these two twin brothers big tall muscular fellows their scam was ingenious both brothers would go into. Home. Depot separately and each begin shopping filling up his cart with high value stuff each filling up his cart with identical items the first brother would go to the cashier and legally pay for his purchases he'd show his receipt at the door and take his purchases out of the store the second brother would hang around the entrance far enough from the exit not to arouse suspicion the first brother would take his car to the entrance and give the receipt to the second brother first dude then takes his purchases to load up in their vehicle second brother then takes the cart full of items plus receipt back to the returns counter and says he changed his mind and wants his money back. Home. Depot would refund the purchases dude basically just sold. Home. Depot their own items evidently they pulled this trick off and on for years before someone caught on. Cops said they probably would have kept on getting away with it for years if they hadn't hit the same store so often.

What's your best fire me. I freaking. Dare. You moment from work over the first year. I worked there. I essentially took over most of the tasks in my department which were previously held by other departments and were done badly because of it this led to a massive increase in productivity. I then found out. I was paid significantly less than what others were making and others in my position across the industry were making so. I go to my boss and tell them. I had done all this work increasing productivity and. I would like to discuss arrays they said no so. I worked there for another year asking for a raise every now and again until. I was offered a job that paid double it didn't start for a couple months so. I held on to that job until. I was set to submit my 2 weeks. I asked for a raise again thinking what the hell why not my boss goes off tells me. I won't get a raise and says some very colorful things about it it culminated with her telling me if you don't like your pay maybe we should evaluate your future at this company to which. I replied already have. I took another job and this was your last chance to offer me what. I deserve. I quit and walked out of that office friends told me that my sudden departure caused a massive backup of work that ended with my manager being fired for it.

What's the best way you've seen someone rebel against school rules a buddy of mine was caught messing with his phone during class back then the school rules were that if you were caught your phone was confiscated for an entire day and you couldn't get it back until the next day this was before smartphones and the rules have changed since then so buddy hands in his phone but doesn't seem too worried about it he waits a couple of classes until lunch break and asks me to come with him he's going to get his phone back we went to the staff room where the confiscated phones were held and asked a teacher there if he could copy down a phone number into my phone so he could call his dad later that day teacher agrees and gives him the phone. I hand him mine and we wait for him to copy the number when he's done he gives me mine back and sticks his own phone in his pocket he was known as a bit of a joker so when he jokingly said well thanks a lot. CA the teacher immediately laughs tells him to stop messing about and to give the phone back laughing and joking about being caught he does but not really see he had a second phone the exact same model except this one was broken wouldn't charge anymore he said so when he stuck his good phone in his pocket it was right next to the broken one when the teacher made him give back the phone he just gave back the broken one it was the best. Switcheroo. I have ever seen.

What's a secret you will take to the grave but don't mind telling on the internet. I am a teacher and. I had a sweet wonderful student who had been in foster care his real mom worked her ass off to get him back and she did he had to take a very important state exam and she called me and asked if he passed it. I looked at the grades and saw he did pass so. I told her so she burst into tears of joy but then. I saw. I had read the wrong score he had failed so. I changed his grade to passing no one knew that was the only time. I ever did that that could have cost me my license the weird thing is when my awful corrupt principal pressured me to change other students scores so we could raise our pass rate. I refused. I never told anyone what. I did for my student he went into the military was extremely successful there has a great wife and kids so. I think. I did the right thing.

What's a school rumor you heard as a kid that turned out to be true years later the most popular boy in. Middle. School disappeared after seventh grade literally his parents sold their house and moved to a new house nearby but pretty secluded he enrolled in a really expensive private school and cut off all ties with his friends at the same time a really popular male social studies teacher went on leave rumors circulated that the boy was touched by the teacher and that's why they were both gone the other popular kids got really pissed when people said that because they really liked the teacher and the kid eventually people stopped talking about it fast forward to senior year in high school he shows up at our prom as the date of his fifth grade girlfriend first time anyone had seen him in years apparently he reached out to the girl to ask if she had a date because he wanted to see all his old friends. One. Last. Time apparently he was touched by the teacher during tutoring sessions at the teacher's home the school district and his parents agreed to bury it in exchange for tuition to the private school he never wanted to leave and really resented his parents for it by the time prom rolled around he was 18 and they couldn't stop him he wanted to set the story straight and let everyone know he was sorry for just disappearing.

What have you done that your parents punished you for but it was totally worth the punishment one time my younger brother told our mom. I hit him he just walked into my room and started screaming that. I hit him. I hadn't even looked at him so of course mom comes in won't listen to me at all and immediately grounds me my younger brother has this smug grin on his face and. I thought it. I'm already getting punished for hitting him so mom's like you're grounded for hitting your brother. I turned to him and punched him as hard as. I could in his sternum he dropped then. I go all right. I'm grounded and walk away way oddly enough mom didn't say anything at that point. I like to think she realized what was up bonus my brother never pulled that again consequences.

I made a kid's. Halloween by recognizing him a few years ago my boyfriend and. I were handing out candy on. Halloween when we started running low he quickly left to grab more and just a few minutes after he called me he told me to watch out for this little boy with a train costume he's not. Thomas the. Tank. Engine he's. Oliver and he's been upset all night because everyone keeps calling him. Thomas the kid had been crying to his dad that nobody recognized who he really was a little while later this boy showed up at the door and his costume was absolutely. Next. Level it wasn't just a cardboard box painted like a train it was the full train with the kid standing right in the middle and even a chimney where you could drop the can indan his dad stood behind him recording on his phone looking tired but hopeful. I opened the door and practically shouted oh my. God. Oliver the. Tank. Engine. I love. Oliver he's my favorite the change in the boy's face was instant his eyes lit up and he was grinning from ear to ear he turned to his dad who looked like he couldn't believe it either the boy kept bouncing saying she knew she knew. I was. Oliver his dad overwhelmed just smiled and nodded still filming the whole thing as they walked away. I heard the kid repeating she knew. I was. Oliver she knew all the way down the street it hit me so hard. I closed the door and burst into tears.

Am. I wrong for accepting money from my parents for my wedding than eloping my parents gave each of my brothers $50,000 when they graduated from. University as a down payment on their home when. I graduated they did not do the same for me. I asked about it and they said my husband should provide. I wasn't married. I still lived at home 3 years later. I met my husband we dated for a year and then we got engaged my parents were. Overjoyed when we set a date they gave me a check for $50,000 to pay for the wedding. I took the check and we eloped we then used the check for a down payment on a house my husband had a similar amount saved up so we are in a good spot with. Equity my parents bear. Furious that they didn't get a big wedding for all their friends and family to attend they said that they gave me the money for a wedding my argument is that. I got married and had leftover money accurate in my books my brothers are on their side so. I am here to ask if. I'm in the wrong.

When did you realize your parents were bad at parenting. I was six and my mom used to make me pee in a cup once a month she said it was for school and. I believed her one day she asked me to do it again while. I was playing with my older brother. I got up to go but my brother grabbed my shirt to stop me without even looking up from our game he said sit down she's using you to pass her drug tests if you think every child deserves better subscrib.

A husband and wife lie in bed at night wife says. I want to smoke something go buy some cigarettes the husband reluctantly gets up and goes outside but everything is closed only the bar is open he went in sat down at the counter and ordered a drink a girl sat down next to him he ordered her a drink too he offered to take her home so they went she offered to have coffee with him after coffee they made. Wild. Love in the morning the man woke up with the thought oh. God cigarettes he got dressed bought chalk smeared it on his hands and ran home the wife hysterically asks where have you been all night oh. I went out looking for cigarettes but everything was closed only the bar was open. I went in and ordered myself a beer a girl sat down next to me we started talking. I took her home she offered to have coffee with me. I agreed after coffee we made. Wild. Love in the morning. I woke up with the thought oh. God my wife sent me for cigarettes so. I'm here the wife made a malicious face and said show me your hands the. Man shows his hands with a guilty look you brute you played. Billiards with your friends all night again.

A blind woman gets on a plane when she sits down in her seat a passenger shouts at her why are you sitting on me the blind woman says isn't this seat 7n the passenger answers yes this is seat 7n the blind woman replies well. I have my ticket for seat 7n right here the passenger. States. I have a ticket for seat 7n too the blind woman blurts out what why would we both have a ticket for the same seat the passenger responds well this is. Spirit. Airline so of course they're going to sell the same seat twice the blind woman says. I guess that makes sense but. I need to sit down for the plane to start does anyone know anywhere else. I can sit the plane falls into silence as no one is willing to give up their seat until one man stands up and tells the woman you can take my seat the blind woman remarks what a kind young man but may. I ask where you're going to sit now the man answers don't worry. I'll sit on the plane's toilet as the plane starts up the man frowned at the others for their selfishness and the passengers looked at him with. Terror on their faces later that day the man came home crying and his wife asks what happened at work today the man whines. I got fired from my job as a pilot.

What has your child done that is technically wrong but you were proud of them for doing it early in her junior year in high school my daughter was getting something from her locker between classes and a member of the football team touched her trained by her brothers she immediately broke his nose and kicked him between the legs when. I arrived at the principal's office. I listened to the story and nodded wisely then. I said well. I guess the punishment fit the crime why are we here what are you talking about kid's dad says we're calling the cops for this assault. I couldn't help it. I started to laugh you really want to make the fact public that your kid put his hands on a girl. Uninvited and got his butt kicked for his trouble you know what let's call the cops then the principal a nice enough woman tried to calm things down by saying that both of the kids would of course have detention for their inappropriate behavior but. I argued my daughter did nothing wrong and mentioned a lawsuit suddenly my daughter wasn't in trouble anymore on the way home. I told her she owed her brothers for teaching her to stand up for herself.

Who saved your life without even knowing it my mother. Saved. My. Life by cursing me out and making me go to school it was the day after my 11th birthday and. I wanted to stay home to play my new. Super. Nintendo games normally she wouldn't mind but that day she insisted. I go to school we argued saying hurtful things but she won at school. I felt an intense urge to go home and cry on my mother's lap though. I didn't know why after school my god brother and neighbor wanted to play the game with me when we got home the door was locked and the key wasn't under the mat. I climbed the back patio to let us in while they headed to the. TV. I went for some cake my god brother walked through the apartment then told us we needed to go outside he then said. I don't know how to say this but your mother is dead. I rushed back in and found her tied to the bed with a phone cord her throat cut blood everywhere. I ran downstairs to call 911 but the operator thought it was a prank and hung up. I called my grandma and then waited outside until the police and paramedics arrived it's been 26 years since that day and there have been no arrests.

What are the craziest ways you've heard of people making money in. Air. Force squadrons it's normal to have a snack bar that the junior members run at a base that. I was stationed one of the maintenance squadrons had an. Airman who was so bad at maintenance that they just put him on permanent snack bar. Duty. Airman can't. Turner wrench respond surprisingly well to his new task and the snack bar is suddenly well stocked and organized since the snack bar is so well stocked many of the maintainers just buy their lunch there instead of going to the dining facility on the other side of. Base even the air crew stopped by to get a snack since the selection is so good at the end of the year he reports a profit of nearly $3,000 to the. Squadron booster club they are elated and keep him running the snack bar for the next few years he quietly runs the snack bar until his enlistment. Runs. Out receives his honorable discharge and returns to civilian life before he departs he trains a new. Airman to run the snack bar the new guy keeps it going and at the end of the year the new. Airman reports a profit of approximately $188,000 you guessed it the first. Airman had embezzled all of it in untraceable cash and since he'd cooked the books with absolutely no oversight they couldn't prove it the. Squadron leadership realized they would look like complete clowns if they reported this so they did the sensible thing and just kept their mouth shut.

A little girl said to her mother mommy when you were away at work for 3 Days a strange lady came around to visit daddy the mom responded is that so tell it to me again when your dad comes home they waited until the father arrived the mother then asked now dear what were you saying about daddy and the strange lady the dad wanted to talk and explain but the mother stopped him and said quiet. I'll be talking to my lawyer in the morning then the mom told her daughter to continue her story well said the little girl daddy told me to stay put in the living room while they went upstairs but. I followed them and. I saw them hugging and kissing then they went into your bedroom and. I quietly cracked the door open to see what was happening what did you see asked the mom. I saw them hop onto the bed the little girl continued and then what happened asked the mom with an angry expression as she looked the way of her husband the little girl continued then they did what you and. Uncle. Mike did.

A father came back home from work and when he reached his house he found his four-year-old son standing waiting for him at the door why are you not sleeping he asked. Daddy can. I ask you a question yeah sure what happened daddy how much do you make an hour the father was. Furious because he earned a small amount of money why would you even ask that the son became sad and said please. Daddy tell me how much you make an hour okay. I earned $2 an hour the boy ashamed asked. Daddy can you please give me $1 the father was so angry that he shouted is that why you asked me how much. I make to get some money to buy yourself a stupid toy go to your room the little boy entered his room and went to sleep but the father then thought to himself maybe he really needed the money to buy something important the father entered the boy's room and asked son are you asleep no. I'm awake here is $1 for you the little boy smiled and said thank you. Daddy he put the money under the pillow and the father saw that the boy had another dollar under his pillow why did you ask for money if you already had some the boy then gave the money back to his father and said. Daddy. I have $2 now can. I buy 1 hour of your time please come home early tomorrow. I want to spend time with you.

This is what you get for cheating on me say goodbye to your. Minecraft worlds are youing crazy why would you delete my. Minecraft worlds those worlds been with me through thick and thin. I don't care. I saw you at. Gucci with that girl what. I've been watching you cheat me with cameras everywhere you go you are actually fuing insane that's my stepmom cut the crap you think you can lie to me it's not a lie the way you were touching her and laughing with her that is not how you behave with your parents. I went to the mall to do some shopping and that automatically makes me a cheater first of all you did not tell me that you were going to the mall with your mom and second of all. I've been seeing you on your phone like a lot she was helping me get a gift for you since our anniversary is this weekend thanks for ruining the surprise. Sarah wait no please. I'm sorry. Chris. I was just being insecure because. I'm jealous that you were looking at other people but wait why are you so friendly and touchy with your mom it's my stepmom and we're just family. Sarah nothing to worry about you can be honest with me. Chris because. I have something to confess. I had a one night stand with. Jamal it meant absolutely nothing and. I was just drunk can you please forgive me it's all right. Sarah but. I got to be honest with you too. I am seeing her been doing the devil's. Tango with her on a daily and all so it wasn't just a one night stand like yours. I knew it. I just knew that you were lying to me wait there's something else that. I need to say firstly we're done as she is so much hotter than you are and has bigger bubbles secondly. I wasn't lying about her being my step.

Just lost my innocence last night now pay up the $700 no way. I lost it too last night give me my money we both lost it last night. I don't believe that you lost it tell me what happened so. I was just at a costume party and met this guy wait a costume party as in the costume party that. Lorenzo was hosting yeah how did you know uh no reason continue so after. I met him he and. I had a few drinks and he checked off every list he was above 6ot makes six figures a year was even more innocent than me and he loved. Star. Wars he was even wearing a. Mandalorian costume what more could a girl ask for oh what happened nothing. Emily continue the story so as time went on we went to the dance floor and started dancing and that's when. I knew that we both wanted to do it so. I went asked. Lorenzo if he had any spare balloons on him and he did we then went into a guest room and did it for some reason we both kept on the mask to play into the roleplay and it was amazing his game was amazing and he was really good at it you wouldn't even be able to tell that he's innocent once we were done we left our ways but. I forgot to get his number hopefully fate makes us meet again so we can be together now pay me my $700 now were you wearing a. Chun. Le costume by chance yes how did you know that. Mandalorian guy was me. I was just lying so. I could tap the mighty. Chun. Lee look. I get that you're my younger sister but if. I'm keeping it a buck 50 that was fat would you like to increase the world's population.

When did you lose your faith in humanity when. I was in high school. I was really fond of our. English teacher she was really nice to everyone even the troublemakers who were treated as outcasts by the rest of the school that's why. I was shocked when she suddenly began speaking less and less. I could see dark circles under her eyes and it was clear that she was going through a rough time one day out of nowhere she showed up to school with her head completely shaved everyone immediately started making cancer jokes because it was clear she didn't actually have cancer someone then spread a rumor that she was transitioning and wanted to become trans. I was appalled this person had treated everyone equally and with kindness but now they were hellbent on making fun of her instead of helping her. I tried being different but she told me that. I shouldn't concern myself with her and refused to talk eventually most of the school was bullying and insulting her at every chance they got then one fateful day she came into class with a happy look on her face she told us she had shaved her head to support her husband who had terminal cancer and now that he passed away she didn't have any reason to stay in this town anymore and was leaving the school her last words to the students who bullied her were. I hope you all succeed in life.

They made a single stupid rule at our class at my school they introduced this irritating rule if a teacher caught you eating in class they'd ask do you have enough for everyone if you didn't the food had to go away naturally every student hated it so a few of us decided to make the administration regret their decision we spent days planning we pulled our money assigned roles and coordinated everything on the day of the operation it was during math class. A notoriously strict one as soon as class began about five of us pulled out snacks and started munching loudly the teacher like clockwork asked do you have enough for everyone but this time instead of sheepishly putting our food away we grinned and reached into our bags out came boxes of pizza soda bottles sandwiches chips and even fancy desserts we had everything planned down to the. Last. Detail with enough food for the entire class the teacher just stood there utterly speechless as we handed out slices of pizza and passed around drinks with no choice the teacher let us carry on it was an epic day we' taken a rule designed to control us and turned it into one of the best lunch breaks we'd ever had.

My friend tried to make me pay for his expensive dinner so. I just ordered a beer and walked out my friend invited me to dinner but. I told him. I wouldn't go if. Susan or. Greg were there they always order the most expensive meals and expect me to cover the bill he insisted they would be there but asked me to just suck it up this once so. I reluctantly agreed at dinner most people ordered meals around $40 but when it came to. Susan and. Greg they both ordered dishes close to $200 when it was my turn. I could feel everyone staring at me so. I picked up the menu pointed to the cheapest thing a $4 bottle light and sent the waiter away seeing this two other friends also canceled their food orders and decided to stick with drinks after the meal. Greg asked the waiter to split the check six ways. I immediately stood up and corrected him saying the check should be split three ways. Greg looked confused so. I reminded him that three of us hadn't eaten and we'd only be paying for our drinks. I slid a $10 bill towards the check said goodbye and left them to deal with their overpriced meals.

Today my. Nextdoor pregnant neighbor knocked on my door around 7:00 p.m. I heard some knocking on my door and opened it to find my next door pregnant neighbor standing there she appeared to be in her seventh or eighth month of pregnancy she was holding a small plate in her hand and spoke in a very shy voice asking me if. I could give her some of whatever. I was cooking because she liked the smell. I think pregnant women sometimes have strong. Cravings that they cannot resist despite being shy she apologized a lot for her request probably because we don't know each other well. I laughed and reassured her that it was okay. I explained that. I was cooking a traditional meal from my country which included olive oil garlic jalapenos and some spices giving it a nice smell. I happily shared some of my dinner with her and after thanking me she left as. I watched her walk home she reminded me of a cute little penguin happy with her successful little. Hunting. Expedition for some reason. I felt really happy too.

What did you find out about your wife husband only after you got married all the time we were together before. I probably would have said. I would have liked a little more traditional romance but. I appreciated how straightforward and pragmatic he was about other things and thought. I can't have it both ways. I could add that he is a theoretical physicist who works with engineers and he has the personality to match he always said he thought marriage was essentially meaningless eventually for external reasons we decided to do it we threw together a cheap little ceremony in a few weeks to get it over with as we both put it he put on his suit. I put on my pretty dress we had the efficient there and got started however when it came time for the vows in the ring exchange. I suddenly found myself facing a very. Sentimental. Man. Who was clearly deeply in love with me and. Overjoyed to be marrying me after that the same man who took years to feel comfortable holding my hand in public for even five minutes was hugging and kissing me in front of everyone at every moment he could during the ceremony then he wanted to celebrate every week aversary then every month aversary with romantic dinners and having the same cake we had at our wedding he starts celebrating at 1201 am on our anniversaries.

How do you respectfully tell guests that they overstayed their welcome my grandfather did this once there was a family who knocked on the door of our home every night during dinner saying hey can we eat my wife is too tired to cook we were being nice and letting them eat dinner with us every night for about a week then the excuse got old so one night after dinner he put all the plates on the floor and let the dogs lick them clean and put them back into the cabinets the couple and their family were surprised and asked if they did that every night he told them yes why waste the water they left and never came back.

What is the worst thing you have found on someone else's phone an old friend of mine called me frantically requesting. I come to his house because he needed a witness he feared his then wife was about to call cops and accuse him of violence. I don't live close but. I was concerned and drove over they live in a cul-de-sac and. I could hear the screaming before. I got in the door when. I opened the door he was at the top of the stairs trying to explain she is crazy she was trying to explain that my friend is a perv so of course my immediate thought was he must have been caught effing around well to my shock and disappointment she managed to yank the phone from him and she immediately started scrolling to pictures she had to show me to convince me that my buddy have known for over a decade is a perv she showed a d-pick. I was like gross but okay he started yelling that is empty me which made me even more uncomfortable because now my buddy is admitting to receiving. PP pics no he had taken the picture and had sent it to his wife's co-worker's daughter she was 12.

What's the worst thing you've ever heard a teacher say at school in sixth grade there was an. Indian girl in our class and she was getting teased because of the way she smelt she didn't smell bad she just smelled like. Indian food and our teacher did this thing where she would pull a student into the hall and talk to them either about bullying or being bullied well she took this girl into the hall and had one of her talks with her the teacher then comes back into class and tells us all that she had a talk with the girl and explained to her that maybe her family could eat their more traditional foods on the weekends and more. American foods during the week. I will never forget being 11 to 12 and thinking is she crazy. I felt so bad for the girl. I told my mom about it when. I got home that day so my mom started packing me. Syrian lunches my mom was half. Syrian and called the teacher and shouted at her for it the teacher then apologized to the class and the little girl.

What is the biggest act that. I got your back bro that has ever been done for you years ago. I got drunk with some friends at the end of the night. I had lost everyone and took the bus home alone while the bus stops almost in front of my house it takes about 45 minutes to get there. I was really shit-faced and just barely made my way to some seat in the back while. I was getting more and more tired a few minutes later some guys maybe six or seven sat next to me. I could barely keep my eyes open but was able to clearly hear them talking about how they're going to steal my things and maybe beat me up a little so there. I was sitting drunk unable to move my body almost asleep but totally aware of the situation. I was in and there was nothing. I could do about it suddenly one of the guys interrupted the discussion about where to get me and told everyone no one is going to touch the guy that's figa. I know him we used to play together at the river when we were younger he turns to me and talks a few words about how we used to hang out and said. I could sleep now he would watch my back and so. I fell asleep my newfound old bro woke me up when we were at the station and made sure. I got home safe he probably walked home then. I haven't really talked to him since maybe saw him once or twice we live in quite different worlds. I guess.

What is the most horrific thing you ever woke up to. I was a little kid and had a dream that. I was in an earthquake when. I woke up my room was shaking like bed moving across the floor shaking. I ran into my parents room and woke my mom up she told me it was just a dream and to go back to bed. I was scared to go back to my room because if they hadn't felt it why was my bed bumping across my bedroom floor it wasn't against the wall when. I went back in where it should have been it was maybe nine inches away. I thought. I was going insane or there were ghosts. I barely slept next morning. Mom apologized because there had been an earthquake and she was too tired to help me.

What's the dumbest rule your school ever enforced the high school girls room was going through too much toilet paper so the dean stood outside the door and distributed a few squares of toilet paper to us as we went in there were several episodes of girls stuck in stalls until friends could beg for more toilet paper because of period messes or unexpected bowel incidents the dean wouldn't even hand it over she would go in the bathroom and pass it a few squares at a time over the door if the girl didn't catch it as it fell and it landed on the floor that's their fault and they wouldn't get more it took about a week of extremely angry parents coming to the school and calling the school until we finally got our toilet paper back.

What's the cruelest prank you've ever seen in sixth grade. I opened my locker and a note from the boy. I had a crush on fell out saying he liked me too a bunch of girls in my grade were there when. I found it and were super happy for me or. I thought they were when. I went to the boy to ask him about it he said he didn't write it and the group of girls who were there when. I found the note had written it. I turned around and sure enough. They're laughing but it crushed me not that the boy didn't like me back but because. I didn't think these girls. I'd gone to school with since first grade were that mean a couple weeks later the group played a similar joke on one of the girls who was actually in on the prank against me.

What's the saddest meal you've ever eaten when my boyfriend almost died last year. I ate alone for the first time in a long time we worked together we lived together we did everything together. I couldn't get anything down even though the hospital's cafeteria food was surprisingly good. I've never had a more depressing meal in my life the following day the janitor sat down with his lunch at my table he didn't say anything just sat there then after a while he started making small talk and asked how. I was doing it turned everything around for me everyone else was understandably too busy to just sit down a true hero taking time for people he doesn't know and will likely never meet again.

What strange thing did you find out about yourself that you thought was perfectly normal in my early 20s. I started having a lot of pain in my upper left jaw my dentist said there was nothing wrong with my teeth and that. I should go see a sinus specialist. I get to the sinus specialist and they comment on how stuffed up. I must be that was the day. I found out that most people can breathe through their noses most of the time and not just on special occasions turns out. I'm severely allergic to dust mites and how are you not dead way and have been experiencing an allergy attack for 23 straight years that doctor's visit legitimately changed my life. I no longer had to choose between breathing and eating.

People who grew up with strict parents what's the dumbest rule you had to live with my parents always had to know exactly where. I was at all times when. I got a boyfriend suddenly. I wasn't to be trusted with anything. I had to go straight home and could no longer stay at friends houses overnight. I was 18 and had my own car. I also got my phone taken away for several weeks after some of my friends sent inappropriate memes in a group chat. I had no part in it but. I got punished when. I was 19 and living in dorms. I finally turned off tracking on my phone so my parents couldn't track my location not because. I was doing anything bad just because my mother had texted me the night before after. I went to pick friends up from a club and she demanded to know why. I was there the next day while. I was at work my parents drove to my work location and confiscated my car for removing the tracking.

I never really noticed casual racism until. I hired a black man as a waiter at my restaurant last fall. I recently hired a young man of. African-American descent when. I hired him. I didn't consciously take his race into consideration and he has proven to be competent in his job however. I've noticed that the complaints about his service seem to be higher compared to our other servers for instance there was an incident where a customer observed him talking to someone instead of bringing their drinks however it turned out that the person he was talking to was actually the business owner when. I checked a ticket. I realized that the drinks were served just 30 seconds later than expected even though the customer had been waiting for about two minutes another complaint. I received was from someone who flagged me down complaining that one of our servers was standing around doing nothing upon investigation. I discovered that the server was actually inputting a large order at our point of sale terminal this kind of situation has occurred about six times in the past two months interestingly all of these complaints have come from older white men from the baby boomer generation.

Can men get pregnant oh. I am you're pregnant. M you are yeah how about a congratulations instead of laughing at me you could say like congrats or something congratulations. I'm sorry so how far long are you 2 weeks how do you know you're pregnant after 2 weeks my stomach's been growling more than usual so and me and him had sex so. I think yeah. I think that's where it came from how long have you guys been together 2 weeks yeah oh we were like a one night standing. I was going to dip but. I was like that's my kid. I'm from the stake so that's really. Noble of you we need more of that more we need more black fathers take a test yet the test for what. AIDS uh that too but presumably the pregnancy test oh no how do you know you don't just have. PR no. I have a kid too so this is the second time this happen so the first time you had a kid you felt like yeah. I felt the same sensation. I'm feeling now okay and where did the kit come out of my that's kind of obvious right yeah is that funny or something no no you're right so you identify as a woman no and that's kind of offensive. I'm the woman. I identify as a woman so shouldn't you be the pregnant one no. I just told you men could get.

Hey. OG look at this hi kids what starts with in and rhymes with tiger with tiger yeah like should. I report this godamn right what up my. Tigers would the even produce that that's some up kids what starts with. N and rhymes with tiger trying to say you know what. I'm going to do. I'm going to pull the trigger yeah that's what. I'm trying that's yeah. I'm right pull the trigger. D there's something wrong with this baby. I'm going to get pissed cuz this is disrespectful gooo. Gaga it's supposed to be saying that what the melon do that. I guess this is the rated. X version excuse my potty moue but on. G I'm tired of living in this ass house what of my moms. I'mma slap this ugly hoe you talking about that's on set s woo. I don't remember. Coco melon teaching that like my son's not going to know the. NW before. ABCs.

Hello son can you come home. I bought you a new car don't come home dad found your alcohol what he told me not to tell you that's why. I'm using. SnapChat what about the new car wake up bro you're not getting a car but dad sent me a picture. I saw it in the driveway it's a trap to get you to come home then whose car is that. Dad bought it for you but he's going to return it to teach you a lesson what lesson does that teach. I don't know. I told him to keep the car but he's just so mad how did he find the alcohol he found it under your bed why was he looking under my bed. I don't know why are you helping me because we're family is. Mom making tacos no she's in your room looking for more stuff crap mom's involved too what do. I do don't come home. I have to come home at some point the moment you come home you're getting grounded for a long long time dad keeps texting me what should. I say. I do have one idea what is it it won't get you out of trouble but it might save the car what's the idea say you don't want the car say you want me to have it.

Do you need son didn't your mother tell you what your mother and. I were thinking we don't want you to be there when we pick up the. Porsche what do you mean we are embarrassed that our 20-year-old son is buying me a. Porsche. I don't want them to think. I can't afford it myself and instead my son who doesn't even have a high school diploma buys me something like this why can't you just be proud of me. I have built a successful company in 2 years. I send you and. Mom $10,000 every month and. I just bought you a brand new. Porsche stop saying you'll buy it for me we'll tell everyone that. I bought it myself. I'm already looking forward to that thanks for that. Jackson you're not serious are you yes of course your mother and. I are already on our way to the car dealer you'd better start studying just like your brother my brother hasn't earned a scent yet and he's 6 years older than me still better than you what the hell. Dad hey. Jackson we've just arrived at the. Porsche dealer they say the. Porsche has already been picked up what is going on there where is my. Porsche.

My mom abandoned us so we abandoned her back when. I was 18 I found out my mom was messaging someone online who lived in another state one day she decided to fly over there and meet him she was supposed to stay for a week and at first. I thought it was awesome that. I'd have the whole house to myself but then one week turned into two then three then eventually it had been a month since. I last saw my mom everyone kept asking me when she'd be back but she never gave a definitive answer after about 2 months. I got a call from her telling me that she was staying over there and that. I was now in charge of the house which meant. I had to pay all the bills by myself. I refused but she insisted. I pay them since she was no longer living here. I told her she needed to come back and do something with the house because it was under her name and not my responsibility after that she hung up on me and wouldn't answer my calls or texts no matter how many times. I tried to reach her. I ended up packing my things and went to my dad's house when the bills started rolling in she sent me all the links to payment sites but. I ignored them when she saw. I didn't end up paying them she called me screaming telling me. I was irresponsible and that. I'd get in trouble for not paying them. I told her once again that those bills weren't my responsibility especially since. I was already living with. Dad now she said she hopes. I end up homeless on the streets and hung up.

What is not a bullet you dodged but a huge tactical nuke you dodged. I had some chest pains one night and woke up my wife to tell her she got a little scared that it might be a heart attack and we agreed that. I should go to the. ER the nurses were pretty sure it was a false alarm but would run an. EKG as a common practice in my head. I was hoping that the chest pain would come back not to prove a heart attack but so that we can find out what the chest pain was the. EKG was done by one veteran nurse and a new nurse. I was watching over their shoulders something was flashing on the screen that made both nurses look at each other with disbelief they ran it again and one nurse went out to the station for help the other stayed with me and very nicely told my wife and daughter to go back out to the waiting room a few seconds later five to six more people came into the room slowly and calmly and began prepping me for something it turns out that. I was having my second heart attack that night in the. ER the doctors and nurses found an obstruction in my heart and were prepping me to have it cleared in a stent place when. I got out of surgery the doctor who placed the stent told me you probably picked the best time and place to have a heart attack right here in the. ER.

I just realized. I'm jealous of my 6-year-old. I woke up this morning and found my 6-year-old on the sofa fully dressed and ready for school an hour before he was supposed to be up. I asked hey buddy what are you doing up so early he replied. I accidentally peed the bed this morning around like 4: and. I tried to wake you up but couldn't so. I took my blankets off put them by the laundry room and changed then. I came out here. I thanked him for taking care of it and told him not to worry we'll have everything cleaned and ready for his bed later next time make sure you pee before bed accidents happen blah blah blah. Etc then he got up and prepared breakfast. I made coffee and as. I sat there a thought crossed my mind. I'm jealous of this kid this moment took me back to when. I was about his age recalling how. I used to wet the bed but my first instinct wasn't to wake my parents hell no they would have beaten the crap out of me. I instead went to the bathroom stole a roll of toilet paper and tried to dry my pead drenched linen because. I knew if my parents found out. I would be in a lot of trouble and. I was terrified of them my son doesn't have to live with that kind of fear instead he tried to get me and when. I didn't wake up he took care of it himself and. I wish. I felt that sense of safety and reassurance when. I was his age.

Would you stop time for 500 years in return for $100 million you are offered the opportunity to stop time for everyone but yourself it will last $500 years and you cannot back out early you will not age things like moving. Vehicles will be stopped magically but you will be able to start up engines and such and have them work normally planes and satellites will be frozen in air and will not fall and will continue their normal flight patterns after the 500 years unless you purposefully interfere any dangers that will result from something not being serviced for the time will be stabilized. EG nuclear power plants we will be paused so rain and snow will be. Motionless in air the time of day will remain constant food won't spoil and services water electricity will continue to operate normally physical changes can still occur to your body so you can build muscle get injured or even die there is an optional memory recall which will allow you to remember things perfectly if you take it at the end of the 500 years everything will continue as if nothing happened and you will receive the $100 million you have 24 hours to delay your decision at the moment you accept the 500 years will begin would you do this deal and why.